 '

  There is no help on this topic (you shouldn't be trying anyways).
  DONT EVER DELETE THIS help
#
"!"

! repeats exactly the last command you typed.

See Also: -
#A
AC "ARMOR CLASS" "ARMOUR CLASS"

"AC" is your armor class.  It is a number from -100 to 100, roughly

  100 Naked person "Don't look!"
    0 Rather well armored (Plate mail, shields, protective gear around) 
 -100 Armored battle tank

The score command displays your armor class as a number such as 78;
this means 78 on a scale from -100 to 100.  That's not very good btw.

See also: SCORE
#
"SPELL ACID BLAST" "ACID BLAST"

Usage       : cast 'acid blast' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

With acid blast, the caster shoots a solid stream of acid that, if it hits,
scorches the victim horribly.  The damage done by acid blast is dependent on
the level of the caster.

See Also: -
#
ADVENTURE CITY STRUCTURE TRAVEL

(Adventure) (City) (Structure) and (Travel) refer to the purpose of a zone
in the mud.
Cities are zones where you aren't overwhelmed by agressive mobs, where there
are shops to buy things, and where there is usually a place to rent out.
Travel zones are routes of connection between generally cities.
Adventure zones are places where agressive mobs, good equipment, good
experience and good gold can be had.
Structure zones are Adventure zones that are set indoors.
A list of zones can be had by typing 'areas'.

See Also: AREAS
#
"SPELL AERIAL SERVANT"
Usage       : cast 'aerial servant'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Aerial servant summons a weak flying servant to do your bidding.

See also: FOLLOW, ORDER
#
AGE

Age is measured in mud days where a mud day is 36 minutes real time. As your 
character ages, they regenerate mana and hit points more quickly. Look for
items that add to your age or just play the mud for a long time and you'll
really notice the bonus.

See also: -
#
"SPELL AID"

Usage       : cast 'aid' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : 40

Imbues the victim with supernatural presence, increasing hit points and
damage done to enemies.

See Also: BLESS, DAMROLL
#
"SPELL AIR ELEMENTAL" "SPELL EARTH ELEMENTAL" "SPELL FIRE ELEMENTAL" "SPELL WATER ELEMENTAL"

Usage:        cast '[air|earth|fire|water] elemental'
Accumulative: -
Duration:     Instantaneous

These four druid spells summon elementals from other planes of existence
to do the bidding of the caster.  Each type of elemental has its own
unique strengths and weaknesses.  The druid with low charisma should
beware, for the elementals do not come willingly, and they will attack
if not suitably impressed with your power.

See Also: -
#
ALIAS ALIASES ALIAS

An alias is a single command used to represent one or more other commands.
The ALIAS command can be used to manipulate your character's aliases.  Type
ALIAS alone to see a list of your currently defined aliases.

> alias

Type ALIAS <alias name> <command> to create a new alias.  The alias name must
be one word.  The command can be any string.  Aliases may not be nested or
used recursively.  Any command may be overriden by an alias (other than the
ALIAS command itself, of course).

> alias gbb get bread bag
> alias gac get all corpse

^G*^nType ALIAS <alias-name> to DELETE an alias that has already been
defined.^G*^n

> alias gbb

A semicolon (";") can be used to define multiple actions to be taken with
a single alias.

> alias eat get bread bag; eat bread

Note that the 'eat' contained within the eat alias is interpreted as the MUD's
internal eat command; aliases may not be nested or used recursively.  The
variables $1, $2, ... $9 may be used to represent arguments given with
an alias.  For example:

> alias killem cast 'fireball' $1; cast 'harm' $2
> killem fido mage

Would cast fireball on fido, followed by casting harm on mage.  Variables
may be used repeatedly and in any order:

> alias helpem cast 'heal' $1; cast 'bless' $1; cast 'armor' $1

The special variable $* represents the entire input line after an alias:

> alias tr tell rasmussen $*
> tr hi there, how are you today?
You tell Rasmussen, 'hi there, how are you today?'

See also: 
#
ALIGNMENT GOOD EVIL NEUTRAL

Alignment in the game can be very important!  Some mobs attack you based on
whether you are good or evil or neutral!  Alignment varies from 1000 (saintly)
to -1000 (satanic).  Good ranges from 1000 to 351, neutral from 350 to -350,
and evil from -351 down to -1000.  Whenever you kill a mobile, you move closer
to their alignment based on your level vs. their level.

For example: You find that you are suddenly zapped by a sword thats evil only.
You've gotta become evil again!!  ... you check 'score' and see that your
alignment has become -324.  Why, just go kill some good creatures, something
at least of alignment 400, and you'll be evil again. >:-> Simple no?

See also: SCORE, DETECT ALIGNMENT
#
ALL

'all' is used to refer to objects so that you can do fun things like
> get all
(to pick up all the items in the room)
> get all.bread
(to get all the bread in the room)

and so on.

As a side note, you can type get 2.bread to pick up the 2nd bread in the room.
Sometimes that's a handy way to get and drop specific items that have the 
same keywords.

See Also: -
#
ANSI COLORS COLOURS

If you have a color-capable terminal, you may enable useful color-coding
of information with the COLOR sommand, and you may also color phrases
for fun with ^^ (caret).

>>NOTE<<
Placing a ^^n at the end of a colored phrase is STRONGLY recommended to
preserve the integrity of the color stack and to prevent "bleeding colors".
If you bleed color in your title, you may be notitled until you understand
how much this annoys other players.
>>NOTE<<

Usage for color command: color <field> <color>

Colors available:
^nnormal^n		^rred^n		^ggreen^n		^yyellow^n
^bblue^n		^mmagenta^n		^ccyan^n		^wwhite^n
		^Rbright red^n	^Gbright green^n	^Ybright yellow^n
^Bbright blue^n	^Mbright magenta^n	^Cbright cyan^n	^Wbright white^n

Color without any argument shows your color-coding status.
Color on enables color-coding, color off disables color-coding.

Usage for color-coding phrases: ^^<color><phrase>^^n

<color> is the first-letter abbreviation of one of the available colors;
for bold/bright colors, it is the uppercase first-letter abbreviation.

^^^^ outputs as a single caret if it is ever necessary.

See Also: TOGGLE
#
"SPELL ANIMATE DEAD"
Usage       : cast 'animate dead' corpse
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell turns a corpse into a mindless undead servant. There are many kinds
of undead servants and the more powerful you are, the greater the power of
your undead minions (generally).

See Also: -
#
ANONYMOUS

Usage: anonymous

Anonymous is a handy toggle that turns off the class and race and level 
information in the who list.

See Also: TOGGLE
#
"ANTI-MAGIC SHELL" ANTIMAGIC SHELL

Shimmering shells of force can be seen to enclose certain individuals
and monsters.  Rumors have it that they increase the magic resistance
of their owners and may partly absorb the damage inflicted by a magical
attack.  How true are these rumors?  Only one way to find out... >:)

See Also: -
#
AQUEST AUTOQUEST

Auto-questing is something available to players of any level.  You can
get a quest from the questmasters locate in the mud.  If you complete
the quest, you will gain questpoints and a moderate amount of cash.
With the quest points you will be able to purchase quest items from the
questmasters.  The commands are as follows:

aquest points:     Lists your current questpoints
aquest info:       Lists the quest you're currently on
aquest time:       Lists the time remaining on the current quest or the
                   time remaining before you can start a new one
aquest request:    Starts you on a new quest
aquest complete:   If you have completed the task given to you by the
                   questmaster, use this command to receive your reward
aquest list:       List the current items available for purchase
aquest buy:        Purchase quest items by number
aquest giveup:     Abandon your current quest

See Also: - AQUEST-RULES
#
AQUEST-RULES

- Characters are intended to be independent of one another.
- You are not allowed to use your other chars to help with a current
  quest. IE - Logging in another to weakin the mob. 
- If your quest is for a object you must get the object from the room
  you are told to get it at. DON'T get it from another room as that is
  another players quest.
- If your quest is for a object DO NOT log in a lower level to see if
  you can get a quest for the same object to make it easy.
- DO NOT make new chars over and over again trying to get a quest item
  for your higher level char.

If you are found (and you will be) breaking any of the above rules your
char will lose all quested eq and quest points.

See Also: - AQUEST
#
AREA-GUIDELINES

These guidelines are taken from another mud and not all will apply to Kore.
However the general idea and the amount of care and thought that goes into
designing an area most definitely does apply.  I will tailor the specifics
to our mud as I get time.
 
     These guidelines are designed to be read by people wishing to write an
area (or domain, etc).  They are intended to be general, and nothing in them is
final; however, they should be considered final until an exception is made.
Exceptions to these rules are made frequently as people come up with unique
ideas/concepts that have both advantages, and drawbacks.  As usual, the
decision of the highest level admin who decides to intervene in any particular
issue is the final decision in that particular issue.  If you think you have an
idea for an object or situation that will violate one or more of the below
items, feel free to mail approval (or an admin) about it.

THEME...
 
     Each area should have an overall theme, which must take place in
approximately the 0-1600 AD time period.  Note that this doesn't make the theme
requirements strictly "medieval", but does, of course, exclude anything modern,
futuristic, and most likely, prehistoric.

     Areas based on books or music are fine, but the author may not assume that
the players exploring the area have read the book, or are in any way familiar
with parts of the area except those explicitly introduced or explained.

     The theme should be consistent, and any "portals" to new and different
sections of the area should be well-explained and used sparingly.  Also, in
rooms which mark a significant change of atmosphere (example: leaving a swamp,
and entering a village) it should be noted in the long description of the room
that a change will occur if you move in that direction.  On the other hand,
rooms which describe adjacent rooms to excess and do not adequately describe
their own contents are unacceptable.
 

ROOMS...
 
     The long description of an individual room should be readable and
understandable, even if it is the only room a person visits.  The author cannot
assume that the player is traveling through the room in a certain direction, or
that he has just come from another part of the area.  Rooms should, for the
most part, be able to stand alone, though some area atmosphere is allowed for.
Key items mentioned in the long description should be supported as items in the
room code, and in most cases have descriptions which are complete sentences (ie
a subject and a verb).  If the room contains special actions (ie a "search"
command), then those commands must be alluded to in the room's description, or
in the description of a prominent item.  Unusual command structures should be
suggested verbatim (ie "You see a hole in the wall--perhaps you could
center hole".").  The author should not make any assumptions on the
player's gender or equipment in room descriptions.  Over-repetition of nouns
and verbs in a long description is very poor form.  If the author does not make
an effort to enjoy the luxury of synonyms and pronouns, a room may be deemed
unacceptable.  As mentioned above, rooms which rely too heavily on descriptions
of the surrounding rooms to fill space are unacceptable.  Long or short
descriptions which repeat from room to room are not OK.  Variety is required.

     Areas should be mappable on paper, with sub-outrageous difficulty.  Simply
put, if you're in a room and move east, you should then be able to return to
the room by moving west.  This should be true in all cases unless a special
command sends you to some distant room, in which case a special command or
route may be needed to get back.  It is allowable to have larger sub-maps
inside of outer maps, such as a 15-room house surrounded by a 5-room yard, but
areas which either deliberately attempt to foil mappers or are simply too
complex to be drawn will likely be turned down for approval.  Mazes are
basically not allowed, though "maze" is a loose term.  Areas should not be
overly harsh to players who blunder by hunting other players, etc.  In other
words, a player should be able to leave an area that he does not want to be in
without having to have previous knowledge of it.
 
     It is not OK to have a large part of your area which can only be accessed
by a single item (including locked doors).  If an item is needed to pass a
certain point it must be either available for free or in a shop so other
players can get through too.  Locked doors should not be the only way in or out
of any section of your area over 4 rooms.
 

TEXT STANDARDS...
 
     For the most part, standard English typing standards apply, for example:
there should be two spaces after end-of-sentence punctuation, a dash is "--"
(with no space before or after it), etc.  Unless there is some special reason
to do so, do not hyphenate words across lines.  Any numbers less than 10 should
be written out (ie 6 should be six).  For dialogue and other situations that
require quoting, double quotes (") should be used, not apostrophes (').  Colons
(:) should only be followed by one space generally.

     There should be no indentation for paragraphs in room descriptions.  If
you wish to divide long descriptions (or whatever) into paragraphs, use blank
lines inbetween paragraphs.  The same indentation standard applies to item
descrips and all displayed text.

     There should be consistency throughout the area.  If a name or phrase is
capitalized in one part of the area, it should be so area-wide.  Similarly, if
a word has more than one spelling (example: color, colour), its spelling should
be uniform throughout the area.  If some words use the British spelling, all
words with that option should use it.

     In short descriptions, the first word should always be capitalized; but,
in general, only proper nouns should be capitalized in the remainder.  Short
descriptions must not end with a punctuation mark.  Short descriptions should
begin with a definite or indefinite article in most cases, ie "A suit of
leather armor" vs "Leather armor"--the former should be used.

     Long descriptions and rooms' item descriptions should consist of complete
sentences and not fragments (except where a fragment is desirable for effect).
They should stand alone and not begin with a pronoun.  For example,
unacceptable: "look at closet", "It contains clothing."; acceptable: "look at
closet", "The closet contains clothing.".

     All multi-line text that's displayed in an area should be formatted for 80
column displays (no characters should appear in the 80th column, however).  For
long descriptions and /std/room item descriptions, text is run through the
parse_long() function automatically in order to format them, interpret tagging
codes in them (see below), etc.  In these situations, newlines (n) should not
appear in the text (not at the end of the text, either) unless it's for a
specific line-break effect.  Whenever you are displaying custom text (in an
add_action()'ed command, for example), you must format it properly--in general,
you would use format() or parse_long() to do so.

ADMIN REQUESTS AND AREA MAINTENANCE...

     Proper maintenance is a very important part of keeping your area open on 
Genocide.  No one is being paid for any facet of Genocide area-writing or 
game maintenance, so everyone must do their part.  If you cannot properly 
maintain your area (or enlist the aid of others to do so), it will have to be 
closed.  Reasonable time to fix a bug in an area (or domain) is defined as a 
week or less.  Reasonable time to fix a typo/spelling error/grammar error is 
two weeks.

     Whenever reports (via the "remark" command) are made in an area, they 
are saved in the /adm/approval/reports directory.  This directory serves as a 
log of problems that haven't been fixed; occasionally an administrator will 
go through and check on what has and hasn't been taken care of, cleaning out 
old entries.
 
     If your area is closed, and at a later time you do decide to continue 
actively maintaining it, you may have to go through the entire approval 
process again.  Generally, if you make the appropriate repairs in under a 
week no action will be taken.  If you will need longer than a week for some 
reason, send mail to that effect.

Note: not all of this applies, but the general idea and the ammount of thought
most assuredly do.
#
AREAS
 
 ^cNAME                           LEVELS   TYPE                   CREATOR(S)^n
 
 Northern Kore                  1  - 15  (City)
 Training Area                  1  - 15  (Adventure/Structure)  Real
*Jitter Park                    1  - 15  (City)                 Ayana
 Abandoned House                1  - 20  (Adventure/Structure)  Puck
 New Shire                      1  - 35  (Structure)
 Haon-Dor                       2  - 10  (Adventure/Travel)
 Western Slums of Kore          3  - 40  (Adventure/Structure)
 Bone Hill                      5  - 10  (Adventure)
 Moria                          5  - 15  (Adventure)            Proteus
 Valley of the Wood Elves       5  - 30  (Adventure)
 Avalon                         5  - 35  (Adventure)            Mink
 The Great Eastern Desert       5  - 35  (Adventure/Travel)
 New Thalos                     5  - 35  (City)
 Shade's Tower                  5  - 40  (Structure)
 The Chessboard of the Tyrant   6  - 30  (Adventure)
 Gol'gorgoth                    8  - 20  (Adventure)
 Estate of the Artificer        9  - 20  (Structure)            Shyft
 The Sewers                     10 - 18  (Adventure)
 Eastern Slums of Kore          10 - 25  (Adventure/Structure)
 Drow City                      10 - 30  (Structure)
 Tomb of the Kings              10 - 30  (Structure)
 Rome                           10 - 30  (City)
 Greza Ship                     10 - 40  (Ship)                 Aule   
 Warship Ar-Pharazon            10 - 40  (Ship)                 Aule
 City of Eli                    10 - 50  (City/Structure)       Xavier
 Aesir                          10 - 50  (Adventure)
 River Island Of Minos          15 - 20  (Adventure)
 Arachnos                       15 - 28  (Adventure)
 Kandelspire                    15 - 30  (Adventure/Structure)
 Palace of the Tyrant           15 - 40  (Structure)
 Shrok Morath                   15 - 45  (Adventure/City)
 Avernus                        15 - 50  (Structure)            Karn
 Agarost                        20 - 35  (Adventure)            Karn
*City of Orchha                 20 - 35  (City)                 Ayana 
 Thri-Kreen Hive                20 - 35  (Structure)
 The High Tower Of Magic        20 - 40  (Structure)
 The Abyss                      20 - 40  (Structure)
 Ghenna                         25 - 40  (Structure)
 Beanstalk Castle               25 - 40  (Structure)            Mink
 Guild of Demariv               25 - 50  (Structure)            Proteus
 Wicca Island                   30 - 50  (Adventure/Structure)  DirtDobber
 The Keep of Mahn-Tor           30 - 50  (Adventure/Structure)
 Order of Tanalos               30 - 50  (Structure)            Koroc
 Grey Marshes                   30 - 50  (Adventure)            Sezzno
 Tower of Dh'vral               35 - 50  (Adventure/Structure)
 Hidden Temple of Virmene       35 - 50  (Structure)            Shyft
 Temple of Orsus                35 - 50  (Structure)            Real
 City of Orsus                  35 - 50  (Adventure)            Real
 Olympus                        45 - 50  (Adventure/Structure)
 Ruins of Trokair               45 - 50  (Adventure/Structure)  Kasmir
 Blingdenstone                  45 - 50  (City)                 Nashanthra
 River Quiavel                  Any      (Travel)   
 Kore Springs                   Any      (City)
 Dunbar's Road                  Any      (Travel)               Sezzno/Mink
 Sylvan Woods                   Any      (Travel)               Zirnozz
 Sea of Tyress                  Any      (Travel)
 Aren Sea                       Any      (Travel)
 Mining City of Derlin          Any      (City)                 Real
*Aringill                       Any      (City)                 Real/Redone Ayana
 Chaos Arena                    Any      (PK Zone)              Maerlyn
 Undermountain Arena            Any      (Under Construction)   Zirnozz
 Fort Arena                     Any      (PK Zone)              Real
 Battle Arena                   Any      (Quest Area)           Ayana
 
 *: ^cNEW AREA^n
 
#
"AREA SPELLS" "AREA AFFECT"

Area affect spells blast everything in the target's room that isn't charmed
to the caster or grouped with him.  Good examples of area affect spells can
be found in: burning hands, fireball, and earthquake but there are many of
them. You have to be a little careful with area affect spells and generally
only use them on groups of mobs if you are *sure* that you can kill them all
when they attack you.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL ARMOR" "SPELL ARMOUR"

Usage       : cast 'armor' <victim> 
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24 Hours

The Armor spell will improve your AC by 2, or -20 in the 100 to -100 scale.

See Also: AC
#
ASSIST

Usage: ASSIST <person in need>

If Quifael is being beaten senseless by a warg and you feel brave enough
to help him, type ASSIST QUIFAEL to hit the warg.  Note that the warg will
keep hitting Quifael; assist only makes you start to fight whomever you're
trying to assist.

> assist quifael

See also: RESCUE, FLEE
#
ATTRIBUTES STRENGTH INTELLIGENCE WISDOM DEXTERITY CONSTITUTION CHARISMA

There is an "score" command that after 9th level lets you see your 
attributes.  In general though, you don't need this command to really tell
what they are (roughly).  Here's some guidelines for the major attributes,
what they're good for, and how to tell if you have good stats:

Attribute	Good for?	
---------	---------
Strength	+hit, +dam
Intelligence	mage spell success
Wisdom		cleric spell success
Dexterity	# attacks/rnd,+hit,+ac,ability to flee
Constitution	+hit points
Charisma	bard spell success, number of followers

See Also: -
#
AUCTIONS CHANNELS CSAY GOSSIP GRATS NOAUCTION NOGOSSIP NOGRATS
These are channels reserved for specific purposes.  Messages on these
channels reach everyone who is monitoring them.  You must be at least level
three to use these channels.

auction:
Usage: auction <item> <starting bid>
       auction [STAT|IDENTIFY]
       auction [STOP|CANCEL]
       auction TALK <message>
       auctalk <message>
       bid <amount>

gossip <string>
grats <string>

> gossip Hey, is that a short sword on your belt or are you happy to see me?
> grats LEVEL!!!!!!!!
> grats GRATS!!!!!!!

See also: SAY, GSAY, NOREPEAT
#
AUTO

There are a whole series of auto-toggles: Autoassist, Autodirs, Autoexits,
Autogold, Autoloot, Autosacrifice, and Autosplit (so far). Whether a
particular auto-feature is on or off can be seen with the "toggle" command.

See also: AUTOASSIST, AUTODIRS, AUTOEX, AUTOGOLD, AUTOLOOT, AUTOSAC,
          AUTOSPLIT, TOGGLE, AUTOSCAN, BATTLEBRIEF
#
AUTOASSIST "AUTO ASSIST"

Use this auto-feature if you would like to assist anyone in your group who
starts fighting. A great feature if you are a little lagged or dont have a
snazzy client.

See also: AUTO
#
AUTODIRS "AUTO DIRS"

This gives you a nice brief listing of the nearby exits. The format looks
something like: { N E S U } on one line, with your prompt on the next.
Its almost too brief though because its so easy to accidentally walk into
a deathtrap with it.  Autoexits is more complete and shows you doornames 
too.

See also: AUTO, AUTOEXITS
#
AUTOEXITS "AUTO EXITS"

Autoexits gives you a complete list (well fairly, heh) of all the exits 
out of the room you are in. It's just like typing "exits" each time you 
look in a room. It can be a little spammy but it's really good an helping
you orient yourself and avoiding deathtraps by name.

See also: AUTO, AUTODIRS
#
AUTOGOLD "AUTO GOLD"

Autogold sets things up so that if you kill a mob you immediately take the
gold from the corpse. Of course you have to be able to see the corpse to
take the gold from it; details, details ...

See also: AUTO
#
AUTOLOOT "AUTO LOOT"

Autoloot sets things up so that if you kill a mob, you loot its corpse. Its
like an instant version of "get all corpse", so fast that even people with
smart clients can't possibly take the equipment you fought so hard for.

See also: AUTO
#
AUTOREPORT "AUTO REPORT"

Autoreport is used by clerics and other members of groups to watch the
status of other group members during a fight. The report is automatically
displayed after every round of combat. If you have a slow connection or
don't like the spam, keep this disabled.

See also: AUTO, Toggle
#
AUTOSACRIFICE "AUTO SACRIFICE"

Autosac as it is more commonly called, sacrifices the corpse of a mob right
after you slay it, but not before you've had a chance to take its gold and
loot it for equipment (assuming you have toggled either one on) One note of
caution - if your inventory is loaded down to the point where you can no
longer really loot, and autosac is on, autosac will junk the corpse and
everything in it, so BEWARE! You might *accidentally* junk the best equipment
in the mud, *right after* you and others fought hard for it. Watch out!
Know what you're doing when you autosac!

See also: AUTO
#
AUTOSCAN "AUTO SCAN"

Autoscan is used to automatically scan surrounding rooms when you move
or use the look command.

See also: AUTO, TOGGLE
#
AUTOSPLIT "AUTO SPLIT"

Autosplit is a great command for someone who is grouping and to be useful,
pretty much requires that autogold be toggled on. Autosplit makes you split
the gold you get from mobs when they die.

See also: AUTO, AUTOGOLD
#
AWARE

Mobs that are "aware" can't be backstabbed!  Neither can mobs (and players)
who are affected by the ESP spell.  Dang, poor thieves have it rough.

See also: ESP
#
AWAY AFK

Usage     : away

Sets an (AWAY) flag in your title to let others know you're 
away from the keyboard "AFK". They will be informed on if they 
attempt to "TELL" you or by typing the command "WHO".

See also: -
#B
BACKSTAB BS

Thief and Bard only.

Backstab is a way to sneak up on a person and attempt to place your dagger
in his back, at exactly the point where it does most damage.  A successful
backstab gives a damage multiplier, depending on level.

The chance of successfully backstabbing depends on your stats. You can 
always backstab sleeping people.

See also: -
#
BANK WITHDRAW DEPOSIT BALANCE "BALANCE SHEET"
Commands to take money out of the bank, put money in the bank, or see how
much money you have in the bank.  Can be used at any branch of the First
National Bank of CircleMUD (wherever you see an automatic teller machine).

> deposit 400
> withdraw 1000
> balance

See also: -
#
Barney

SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS

SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS SUCKZ SUCKZ SUCKS

See also: TWINK
#
BARDS BARDIC

Bards are a class that are much like fighters and much like thieves, yet
not quite either. Bards play instruments and use them to sing songs that
create magical spells and bards get thier instruments by going through the
Bardic Colleges. Bards have to wield their instrument to sing spells,
which can be a bit of a disadvantage...

Here is a list of your current skills/spells at level 50:

SPELLNAME		LEVEL	COST
kick                    1       n/a
magic missile           1       10
bash                    2       n/a
block                   5       n/a
faerie fire             6       10
rescue                  8       n/a
track                   9       n/a
backstab		10	n/a
barkskin		10	20
disarm			10	n/a
forget                  10      20
fly                     12      20
sleep                   15      25
sticks to snakes        16      50
feeblemind		17	11
inspire			18	11
meditate		20	n/a
mirror image		20	32
scare			21	100
charm person		25	200
slow			25	52
strength		26	26
teleport		30	26
waterwalk		35	26
battle hymn		38	52
wizard lock		42	50
word of recall          46      16
summon                  48      75
relocate                50      50
word of death		50	100

See Also: CLASSES, INSTRUMENT, SPELLS
#
"SPELL BARKSKIN"

Usage       : cast 'barkskin' <self>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24

This spell causes the caster's skin to take on the rough texture of bark, 
reducing the likelihood of being struck in combat.

See Also: ARMOR
# 
BASH

Fighter and Bard only.

The success of a bash depends upon how well you are learned. To bash someone
is to attempt to 'knock' that person over. If you succeed you will inflict
minor damage, and cause the target to fall on it's rear. The target will be
sitting, and will take 1.5 times damage.  They will get up about 4 hits
after they are bashed. A bash makes you unable to type commands for 2 
rounds.  It is important to note that if you miss your bash, you will fall
and recieve 1.5 times damage until you stand, just as if you had been
bashed.

See Also: RESCUE, KICK
#
BATTLE

Usage: battle

Battle takes you to the playerkilling arena.  In the arena you wont lose
your equipment if you die; your corpse always goes back to the temple.

See Also: DEATHMATCH
#
BATTLEBRIEF

Usage: battlebrief

Is the toggle to enable seeing yours and/or others battle messages.

See Also: TOGGLE
#
"SPELL BATTLE HYMN"

Usage       : cast 'battle hymn'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Level Dependent

Battle hymn casts inspire on an entire group.

See Also: INSPIRE
#
BERSERK

Warrior skill that allows them to hit every mob in the room once for one
round, and costs 10 movement points, and keeps you from doing anything else
for one round of 'Violence'.

See Also: -
#
BITE

Undead only.
Usage: bite <victim>

Bite is an innate skill of the undead to relieve their thirst for blood.
If the undead is much more powerful than the bitten victim, they can even
replenish their hit points with the lifeblood of their victim.

See Also: - 
#
"SPELL BLESS"

Usage       : cast 'bless' <victim | object>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 6 Hours, permanent for objects.

Bless on a target PC or NPC will improve the target's saving throw versus spells
and improve the hitroll depending on the level of the caster.

Bless on an item currently has no defined action. It is only possible
to bless non-evil items, and the object blessed may weight no more
than five pounds per level of caster. 

See Also: AID, HITROLL 
#
"SPELL BLINDNESS"

Usage       : cast 'blindness' <victim>
Accumulative: No.
Duration    : 2 hours.

Blindness will blind a victim failing its saving throw.
A blinded person will have -4 penalty to both hi
troll and AC.

See Also: AC
#
BLOCK

Block is a fighter/bard skill that allows the player to block the attacks of
the mob they're fighting for one round. Very handy skill.

See Also: BASH
#
BOARD DISEMBARK SHIP STEER

Ships are full-fledged areas that can also be moved through other areas
like a vehicle.  Players generally board ship, steer around (where is
that tiller anyway?), beat up a few mobs while aboard, and disembark
onto a suitably dry land.

See Also: -
#
BOTS ROBOT

Bots are scripts that are run on a player's Mud client.  Bots will no
longer be permitted here if the player is afk, and any player found using
a bot can be frozen, disconnected, have eq or level stripped, or simply
be warned.

See Also: TWINK
#
"BULLETIN BOARDS" BOARDS

Bulletin boards are the forum of interplayer communication on the MUD.
There are different bulletin boards for different purposes -- for example,
a standard mortal board, a board for immortals, a board for fun "social"
messages, etc.  Naturally, not all players may be allowed to read all
types of boards.

Type "LOOK BOARD" to see the messages already posted on a board.  Type
"WRITE <subject>" to post a message to a board; terminate a message with
a '@' as the first character on a line.  Type "READ <number>" to read a
post.  Type "REMOVE <number>" to remove your own messages.

> look at board
> write Am I using these boards correctly?
[writes the message; terminates with a '@']
> look at board
> read 6
> remove 6

See Also: -
#
BRIEF

Toggle "brief mode".  When in brief mode, you don't see the descriptions of
the room you are in; only the name of the room and the people and objects
there.  Unless you're very familiar with the area in which you're travelling,
however, it is not advisable to use this command.  Frequently, you will find
small but vital hints in the descriptions of the rooms: An extra peek at your
surroundings could mean the difference between life and death!

If you explicitly type 'look', you will always see the full room description,
even in BRIEF mode.

See Also: COMPACT, LOOK
#
BUG TYPO IDEA

For making useful suggestions to the Powers that Be.

{bug | typo | idea} <text>

> bug the entire game crashes when I type 'put bag in bag'
> idea make a restaurant in Kore
> typo 'sence' should be spelled 'sense'

See Also: -
#
BUGBEAR

Bugbears are giant relatives of goblins that only value two things in life,
survival and treasure. Typically they eat what they hunt, with *anything*
being fair game. They are fierce in battle, yet not very intelligent, and
since they can see in the dark they prefer to live either underground or in
caves.

See Also: RACE
#
BUILDERS

Here on Heroes of Kore we're always looking for more builders and more areas.
If you have an idea or suggestion, you can jot it down with the "idea" command.
But if you feel that creative urge, why not grab ahold of one of the
Implementors and talk over your idea with them? They are usually pretty busy,
but sometimes an area idea will really catch their interest. Kore has a strong
medieval/fantasy theme and area ideas that feature very difficult mobs and
great rewards are perfect.

See Also: - 
#
BUILDING-STANDARDS

- Graph paper is your friend. You should always map out your areas prior to
  building.
- Never refer to a mob or removable object in the room desc. It looks silly
  if the mob or object isn't there.
- Never refer to the time of day, time passes quickly on a mud.
- Never assume a player is coming from a certain direction.
- Use your extras! If you refer to anything in the desc that is not a object
  that loads in the room, make a extra for it.
- Formatting and indenting is a must for room and mob desc. Depending on the
  size of the desc , objects desc should also be.
- Room length should be atleast three lines long and no more then nine long.
- Don't tell a char what he feels emotionally. IE You are scaried. A better
  way to say it would be - The dark and foggy atmosphere is chilling and
  would scare even the most stalwart of adventurers.
- Never ever start a room desc off with YOU. Never Never Never No Never. 
  Try to limit your use of the word YOU. <--- Ayana don't like that!
- Areas should be unique and follow the theme of the mud. Never steal a area
  from another mud.
- It should be possible to map your area on paper with a minimal confusion.
- Room names should be capitalized properly. First letter of any room name
  is capitalized no matter what. Capitalized each of the following words
  unless they are unimportant like "a" "of" "the".
- Don't tell the person exactly what room they are in unless it is apparent
  from the desc. Rather then "King Karns Bedroom" say A Royal Bedroom.
- Mobs must have desc.
- Objects must have extra desc.
- Gold on mobs should be set at 0 as it will automatically generated.
- All mobs should be flaged stay zone so they don't leave the zone.
- Any toys found in your zone will be changed. (over powered weapons and
  objects)

Above is subject to change etc... If you see a need to do something that
should not be done etc... Ask approval prior to doing.

See Also - 
#
"SPELL BURNING HANDS"

Usage       : cast 'burning hands' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 5 magic user.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell is not very powerful but attacks all mobs in a room.

See Also: - 
#
BURY

Bury is just like sacrifice, only with different messages. You receive 5 coins
for every corpse you bury. You may want to set autosacrifice on if you kill
things a lot. ;)

See Also: AUTOSACRIFICE
#
BUY

If you'd like to purchase an item from a shop and have the money, you can buy
it.  Items can be bought by name, or by their number in the shop listing,
and can be bought in quantity.
 
Examples:
 
> buy sword        (buy the first sword on the list)
> buy #3           (buy the third item on the list)
> buy 4.sword      (buy the fourth sword on the list)
> buy 10 bread     (buy 10 pieces of bread)
> buy 10 #2        (buy 10 of the second item on the list)
 
See Also: SHOPS, SELL, LIST, VALUE
#C
"SPELL CALL LIGHTNING"

Usage       : cast 'call lightning' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell will use the "force of nature" to make a lightning
strike the victim. It is therefore only possible to call lightning
outside, and it has to be raining (or worse).

The lightning will inflict (level)d8 points of damage, up to a
maximum of 15d8 damage points.

See Also: WEATHER, CONTROL WEATHER
#
CAST CASTING

For "magical" people. If you want to throw a spell at someone or something.
Example : cast 'burning hands' <player>
   Note that the name of the spell must be enclosed by "'"s.

See also : help on each individual spell, for example:
  > help cure ligh
  > help ventri
  > help energy drain

See Also: -
#
CHANGES

10/19/01 - Fixed bug in stock Circle code that caused you to lose
	   gold when you died while linkdead.
10/11/01 - Gnomes and Hobbits can now be warriors.  Thanks to
	   Thanatos for this suggestion.
04/15/01 - Hostile affect spells will now trigger combat.  This
           is basically anything that can be cast in combat.
04/15/01 - Faerie fire made hostile.
04/13/01 - I have TEMPORARILY removed my previous change to
           damroll.  The effects were too chaotic, so I'm going
           to work on another solution.
04/13/01 - Turns out acid blast was doing much more consistent
           damage than say, color spray and word of death.  I
           took the same formula used for acid blast and modified
           it to work with these spells, so their damage should
           be more consistent.
04/13/01 - Any clan member who is above CLAN_LVL_MEMBER may now
           initiate new members.  Only the clan leader may
           outcast or set clan levels.
04/13/01 - Implemented Jeshko's suggestion on languages.  To
           understand a language is no longer based on race, but
           on the language itself, so halfelves can now understand
           elves, etc.
04/09/01 - I'm in the process of adding affects to what you
           see when you look 'at' someone.  It might get a bit
           spammy, if so use 'diagnose' to see someone.
04/09/01 - Took out the ranged slot.  Nothing will be replacing
           it, and you can junk the bows for all I care.
04/09/01 - Bug in bash and trip fixed.  Bad position check.
04/07/01 - In the process of changing some equipment and progs.
           Just FYI really, not going to take complaints on eq
           changes.
04/07/01 - Weapons with damage spells on them have lost them.  Some
           might come back, but under different rules and toned down.
04/06/01 - Beginning the long process of balancing spells across
           classes.  This is going to make spell damage a bit more
           random.  Potential damage won't change much, but average
           will fluctuate.  This corresponds with the earlier change
           to melee classes.
04/06/01 - Changed the cost for mana shell in the code.  You will
           now be charged mana for base damage before damage is
           modified by sanc, etc.
04/06/01 - Added mana shell.
04/06/01 - Ranged combat has been completely removed from the game.
04/06/01 - Melee damage has been modified somewhat to make damage
           a bit more random, and a bit more based on average
           damage of the weapon.
04/06/01 - Added fireshield.
04/06/01 - Mob saving throws lowered very slightly.
04/06/01 - Web recoded and re-added, now mage only.
04/04/01 - Trip and Bash both now have verbose messages.
04/01/01 - Trip now more effective vs. players.
04/01/01 - Stoneskin and mirror image now actually work vs. bash.
           In addition you no longer need a weapon to bash, you
           need a shield.  Much more logical.
04/01/01 - MAX_ALIAS for any level is now 100
01/14/01 - Doubled the number of possible affects in the mud, and
	   probably added some new bugs.  But hey, we needed some.

See Also: OLDCHANGES
#
OLDCHANGES

11/19/00 - Bug in stand that allowed you to stand in combat after
	   having been bashed or tripped and were then able to
	   cast non-combat spells.
09/25/00 - Initiate should be fixed.
09/22/00 - Clan members ranked lvl 2 can now initiate new members.
07/09/00 - Quest objects are now no locate.
04/13/00 - Kore has changed, some of you may recognize it.  Expect
	   the city to change quite a bit in the coming days.
04/08/00 - Read the updated helpfile for DEATHMATCH
03/27/00 - Took out several of the ways charm person can fail.
03/27/00 - Quickdraw is being redone.  For the time being you
	   will not get any attacks from quickdraw, it will
	   still make you stand and wield a weapon.
03/27/00 - Rewrote most of critical hit, see necessary helpfiles
	   for changes.
03/27/00 - Fixed the damage message for critical hits.
03/27/00 - Mob regen has been slightly modified again.
03/27/00 - Saving throws are now visible in score if you're level
	   25 or higher.
03/27/00 - Charm may no longer be cast in combat.  What's with that
	   anyway?
03/27/00 - Curse may now be cast in combat.
03/27/00 - Attempting to charm a mob (and failing) is considered an
	   act of aggression.  Also, when mobs are free of your charm
	   they may choose to exact revenge.
03/26/00 - Curse will now affect the target's saving throws.  I know
	   you liked that minus 1 to their hitroll, but this might
	   be more effective.
03/26/00 - Charmed mobs will now keep fighting, but they might not like
	   you so much if you leave them.
03/26/00 - No more multiple backstabs and circles.  I know, I know, I've
	   finally gone and ruined the mud.  Even Knife hates me.  Oh the
	   humanity!
03/26/00 - You should get exp when charmies get a kill if they're grouped
	   again.
03/26/00 - Fixed the age-old phantom damage bug in ranged combat.  Should
	   also take care of the weird messages when a mob enters the room.
03/26/00 - A lot of the combat skills are having the damage they do tweaked.
	   Most were poorly written and didn't take into account damroll
	   and other factors.
03/26/00 - Re-scaled the damage messages.  Tweak Tweak.
03/26/00 - Spell damage has been changed.  Spells used to do more damage to
	   mobs.  That is no longer true.  Please refer all complaining
	   to /dev/null.  Thank you, drive through.
03/26/00 - Fixed problem where you'd see mpdamage.  Also changed it so you're
	   not doing mpdamage to yourself.  You'll also no longer get damage
	   exp for mpdamage and poison damage, and you won't gain exp for
	   dying to poison or mpdamage.
03/26/00 - Fixed the broken idea board.
03/26/00 - You can no longer yank in combat.  Bad men.
03/26/00 - Added a message to retreat that will show you which direction
	   you take when you leave combat if you successfully retreat.
03/26/00 - Damage messages have been recoded, yay.  Ok, so there are some
	   bugs, but it kinda rules.
03/24/00 - Class experience has been tweaked.  Some of the class experience
	   modifiers were changed.  Thieves and druids were made a bit easier
	   to level while clerics were made a bit more difficult.  This is 
	   part of an effort to maintain class balance when remort classes
	   are available.
03/24/00 - Mob regen has been lowered somewhat.
03/24/00 - Removed 40 or so unopened zones.  This should make quests a lot
	   more consistent and cut down on mem usage of the mud.
03/24/00 - Added a 'clanleave' command.  This will make you an outcast.  Do
	   not use hastily, as we will not reverse this if you change your
	   mind.
03/24/00 - Mobs should no longer die on the pulse while you're fighting them.
03/24/00 - Fixed some problems with shops, still working on getting these right.
03/20/00 - Berserk now has a 2 round delay.  It was always supposed to, dunno
	   why it was overlooked.
- Regen has been moved from the tick and placed on the pulse.  This may
require some tweaking over the next few days.
- Delete has been re-enabled.  If you delete your character we will never
ever restore it.
- There is a new zone flag for active zones.  If you get into an inactive
zone, you'll be told you shouldn't be there.
- You can now customize your prompt. See 'help custprompt' for details.
- Players can now supply an email address in case of password problems.
  See 'help email'.
- Poofins and Poofouts now save when you rent
- Titles will now be given out by gods level 58 and above only.
- Thri-kreen wear_face is fixed.  Thanks for pointing this
out Fei.
- Power Word Stun now gets a save.
- There is now a high rate of failure when trying to summon 
someone who is fighting.
- Backstabbing while stoneskinned will now halve your chance
for extra attacks.
- Helper mobs will now assist mobs vs. mobs.
- Players who are set noauction will no longer hear auctalk.
thanks Cameron.
- Fixed "worn on face" for thri-kreen.  Thanks Fei for pointing
out this problem.
- The 'score' command has been rewritten.  The old version is
available as 'oldscore'
- Saving throws have been rewritten.  They now work on a 25 point
scale (instead of 100) and they are not modified for level.  So
you'll have to wear saving throw eq if you want to make saves.
- Autoscan has been removed.  It will be unset when you log in
after reboot.  The "where" command is now allowed for mortals,
but will only show other players.
- It's been pointed out that high level players are getting quests
with low level characters and logging on their high levels to fetch
the items.  It has also been noted by me that people are weakening
mobs with high level characters and logging in their low levels to
finish them off.  Characters are intended to be independent of one
another.  This has prompted two changes.  The autoquest token items
are now nodrop.  Also, there has been an ammendment made to the
MULTIPLAYING policy that includes weakening mobs for your other characters.
- Fixed a memory leak in autoquest.  Also added an object flag for
autoquest.
- Fixed a couple more bugs in autoquest.  The code was returning when
it found someone who could begin questing again instead of continuing,
so hopefully it shouldn't skip ticks on people now.  Also there was a
bug in quest giveup, that's fixed.  If you gave up on a quest and now
get nothing when you type aquest time, go to Gortok and type aq fixme.
- Added some debug code to quests, also think I found why some people
would have a quest even though he said he didn't have one.
- The Elemental race has been renamed Angel.  I don't have any plans
to complete what I had planned for elemental, and the race doesn't
really make sense without it.
- Mob racial guessing code is back in.  That means most undead should
actually be flagged undead again.  Sunray should actually do damage
now.  Sorry this was disabled, not sure why.
- Crash bug in the new wear location code fixed.  Thanks Morgus for
finding this.
- I spent a great deal of time today putting in an autoquest system.
You will see an adventurers guild in Kore.  This is not open to the
public just yet, I need to do some more testing, but it will be ready
very soon.  You should find it quite challenging, as well as quite
interesting.
- I've heard a lot of confusion about why recall was changed.  The
reason it was changed was to clear the way for racial areas.  They're
not quite ready yet, but soon different races will start outside the
main city of Kore.  It has long been my intention to take the focus
off of the city of Kore as the center of the world and add some new
interesting cities.  This is a step in that direction.
- Bug in wild heal fixed.  Instead of just taking hitpoints if you
get unlucky it will hit you with poison damage.  It will not cause
you to be poisoned, just hit you with that damage type.
- Recall will now return you to the last room from which you entered
the game.
- Since you now have an abundance of moves, you can expect some new
things to cost movement.  This may mean melee takes moves, more if
you wield a heavy weapon.  It may also mean certain skills either
require you to have a certain number or percentage of moves, or will
take moves when used.  Expect this, don't be surprised if it comes.
- The remort gauntlet is going to be rewritten and you will be required
to pass it in order to remort, look for this in the coming weeks.
- You will now gain movement points based on dexterity when you level.
If you're already level 50 and you feel your moves are too low, you
can always remort.
- Dispel magic has been rewritten.  Each spell affect that is on the
victim will receive a saving throw.
- Area effect spells can now be cast without an argument as long as
there is a valid target present.
- Mobs that are immune to skills such as bash and block will no longer
report so, you will simply fail.  Also missing a skill will take the
same delay as succeeding.
- Group experience has been recoded somewhat.  See help EXPERIENCE.  Also
level restrictions on grouping have been removed. (You can thank Maerlyn
for this one, he chewed me out about group restrictions)
- You will no longer autoassist when not in the same room as the fighting
character.
- Death has been recoded.  You should stay in your group when you die and
pop up in the temple similar to an arena death, only your hps and mana will
be at 1, and your corpse will be where you died.
- The "visible" command will now dispel any remaining mirror images (Thanks
to Hagen for this suggestion)
- The affect portion of sunray is currently disabled while I decide how I
want to recode it.
- Stoneskin will no longer protect you from magical attacks, and it will now
tickle instead of miss, since missing was misleading.
- Stoneskin, Mirror Image, and safe rooms will no longer protect from poison
(Thanks to Hampo for pointing this out)
- Area effect spells will now hit all mirror images dispelling the spell
effect (Thanks Rufus for this suggestion)
- Some changes have been made to cursed items.  I suggest you treat cursed
items with a fair amount of respect.
- Cleaned up implementor-only system channel.
- Scavenger mobs will now wear the equipment they pick up.
- Bite will no longer take mana when your victim is not found. (Thanks to
Hagen for pointing this out)
- Some minor typos fixed
- Fly will now only reduce the number of movement points needed to move
from room to room, not nullify it completely.
- A bug has been fixed in enchant armor.  It should never have affected
wisdom.  The bug only affected some enchants, as there is a variation
in the affect of enchant armor.
- Warriors (and knights) will now do damage based on their level when
fighting without a weapon.
- Helpfiles on spells have all been recategorized, you now need to use
"help spell <spellname>" to access those helpfiles
- Locate object has been changed.  You may no longer locate objects on
mobs that are more than 10 level greater than your level.  The spell will
also always cast, whether it finds your target or not, whether the target
exists or failed due to your level.
- Clerics and thieves, you've asked for it for a long time, you got it.
Thieves will now receive 1 exp for each gold they steal from mobs that
are equal or greater than their level.  Clerics will now receive 1 exp
for each point of damage they heal on players other than themselves, and
only while that player is in combat.
- A lot of players level mages up to 15 or so in order to get locate
object.  To encourage the play of low level clerics, I have granted
clerics the locate spell at level 21.
- To compensate for the loss of wimpy to thieves, the delay on backstab
has been slightly reduced, and you may now backstab while stoneskinned.
- The spell 'blindness' is now considered a violent act.  Therefore it
may not be cast upon players, but may be cast while in combat.
- Following has been restricted.  You may only follow someone within 10
levels of you.
- The wimpy command has been removed.  Along with this change, the flee
command has been modified to make it a bit easier to flee, though it's
still based highly upon your dexterity.
- There is now a chance to ^Rfail fleeing^n from a fight.  This chance is
directly related to your ^YDexterity^n
- If you die and lose enough exp to put you below your previous level,
you will de-level. The exp loss cap has been greatly increased as
well. This won't affect lower levels, but higher level players will
lose a great deal more experience than previously.

See also: NEWS
#
"SPELL CHARM PERSON"

Usage       : cast 'charm person' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : (432/Itelligence points of person) hours

Is is not possible to charm anyone that is already charmed, if
you're charmed yourself, or if the person is higher level than
yourself. The person will get a saving throw versus "paralysation".

A charmed person will follow you, and not be able to attack you, you
can order charmed person using the order command.

See Also: FOLLOW, ORDER
#
"SPELL CAUSE CRITICAL"

Usage       : cast 'cause critical' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Cause critical is a more powerful version of cause serious.

See Also: CAUSE LIGHT, CAUSE SERIOUS 
#
"SPELL CAUSE LIGHT"

Usage       : cast 'cause light' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Cause light is a basic offensive spell for clerics where the caster focuses
harmful energy into his or her fists and attempt to strike the victim, causing
damage.  Since clerics are defensive in nature, the force of this harmful
energy isn't great.

See Also: CAUSE CRITICAL, CAUSE SERIOUS 
#
"SPELL CAUSE SERIOUS"

Usage       : cast 'cause serious' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Cause serious is a more powerful version of cause light.

See Also: CAUSE CRITICAL, CAUSE LIGHT 
#
"SPELL CHAIN LIGHTNING"

Usage       : cast 'chain lightning' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This *IMPRESSIVE* spell does a lightning bolt over an area affect, 
It is an extremely powerful spell, but it also tends to make a lot of
mobs angry. :)

See Also: LIGHTNING BOLT
#
CHAMPION

The champion flag on an item requires that the wearer be at least level 42 to
use that item.

See Also: VETERAN HERO
#
CHAT

This is a social.

usage: chat <mob> <subject>

> chat vulmarta jogging

NOTE: not all mobs will react to this, but some will.

See Also: LISTEN
#
"SPELL CHILL TOUCH"

Usage       : cast 'chill touch' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage

This spell is more powerful than the shocking grasp spell.
A victim failing its saving throw will get its strength
reduced by one.

See Also: SHOCKING GRASP
#
CIRCLE

Circle is a thief skill that allows a player to get half the damage of
a backstab onto one of the mobs that they aren't fighting. It delays the
thief just like kick delays a fighter.

See Also: BACKSTAB
#
CIRCLEMUD
                    C  I  R  C  L  E  M  U  D     3  .  0

CircleMUD was developed from DikuMUD (Gamma 0.0) by Jeremy "Ras" Elson at
Johns Hopkins University's Department of Computer Science.  All code unique
to CircleMUD is protected under a copyright by the Trustees of the Johns
Hopkins University.

Many, many people contributed to CircleMUD in one way or another throughout
the course of its development.  Although it's impossible for me to remember
them all, I'd like to extend special thanks to certain people:

  -- Jeff Fink, for submitting a veritable mountain of excellent code.
  -- Fred Merkel, Ryan Watkins, Jay Levino, and Sharon Goza, for other
     code and area submissions.
  -- Furry (Alex Fletcher), for single-handedly managing Circle's world files.
  -- Jean-Jack Riethoven, for porting the code to the Amiga.
  -- Bill Bogstad and Tim Stearns, for allowing Circle to exist.
  -- The DikuMUD folk, and the good old WhatMUD implementors Dave & Justin,
     for starting the ball rolling.
  -- Bryan Jolson, Steven Lacher, Cat Stanton, and Naved Surve, for being 
     there in the very early days of Circle's development.
  -- And, of course, Sharon, Ben, Erica, Aly, and Josh, for keeping me sane.

...plus everyone else in the Circle community who has submitted material!
Thanks everyone!

  Anoymous FTP:  ftp.cs.jhu.edu:pub/CircleMUD
Author's Email:  jelson@cs.jhu.edu
           URL:  http://www.cs.jhu.edu/other/jelson/circle.html
  Mailing List:  circle@pvv.unit.no

See Also: -
#
"SPELL CLAIRVOYANCE"

Usage       : cast 'clairvoyance' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Clairvoyance is an useful/annoying spell that allows the caster to look
out through the eyes of the victim.  If the victim is a PC, the caster
must be of a higher level to be able to cast the spell on him or her.

See Also: -
#
CLAN

    The clan help file system is seperate from the normal help file system.
To use clan helps, type CLANHELP <TOPIC>. If there is a file on the topic 
you requested it will be displayed. Typing CLANHELP without a string will 
show instructions and a list of the current clanhelp topics.

#
CLASSES

There are essentally six main classes in Kore:

Warriors:	Great hit points, multiple hits, great for tanking.
Clerics:	Great mana, good hit points, lots of assistance spells.
Mages:		Great spells, great mana, average hit points.
Thieves:	Good combat abilities, pick locks, sneak, backstab.
Bards:		Good spells, good hit points, some thief skills.
Druids:		Great mana, good hit points, many nature-based spells.

See Also: -
#
CLEAR CLS

Clears the screen on many terminals.

See Also: -
#
CLERICS
Clerics have an ancient belief in not carrying sharp weapons. Hence, they can
only wield bludgeoning weapons. This class gives you the wisdom of peace,
blessing and healing, though it is possible to learn more violent spells.

Here is a list of your spells at level 50:

SPELLNAME		LEVEL	COST
continual light		1	5
cure light		1	10
armor			2	10
cause light		3	10
create food		4	5
faerie fire		4	10
create water		5	5
word of recall		5	6
cure serious		6	15
cause serious		7	15
bless			8	15
aerial servant		9	30
meditate		10	n/a
sticks to snakes	10	50
cure blind		11	11
waterwalk		11	25
detect invisibility	12	15
defensive harmony	13	30
infravision		14	25
remove poison		14	50
poison			15	20
protection from good	15	40
protection from evil	16	30
cure critic		17	20
cause critic		18	20
blindness		19	25
aid			20	15
group recall		20	16
wild heal		20	50
animate dead		21	51
locate object		21	51
dispel evil		23	25
dispel good		24	25
sanctuary		24	71
heal			24	50
curse			25	30
insect plague		26	120
harm			28	50
remove curse		30	30
summon			32	52
prayer			33	61
earthquake		35	26
holy light		35	31
control weather		36	26
call lightning		37	26
gate one		40	105
petrify			41	100
spiritual hammer	41	60
group heal		42	90
gate two		45	160
restore			45	270
relocate		47	50
dispel sanctuary	49	100
gate three		49	250
group sanctuary		50	200

See Also: CLASSES, SPELLS
#
"SPELL COLOR SPRAY" "SPELL COLOUR SPRAY"

Usage       : cast 'color spray' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell is more powerful than the chill touch spell.

See Also: CHILL TOUCH

For help on actual color, see: ANSI
#
COMBAT
These are commands that can be used while in combat:

CONSIDER What you always should do before even thinking of attacking
KILL     Basic command to initiate combat
FLEE     Makes you try to run away from combat
ASSIST   Joins in a battle of a person being attacked
TRACK    Follows the path to a mob
CAST     Casts an (offensive) spell
BATTLE   Takes you automatically to the PK arena

LINK     Information on freezing/losing link in battle

See also: PK, EXPERIENCE, DEATH, GROUP
#
COMMANDS

The COMMANDS command gives a canonical list of all the known verbs.

> commands

Each command listed should have help available by typing "HELP <command>".

See Also: HELP
#
COMM COMMUNICATING COMMUNICATION
These commands are used to communicate with several other characters at
once:

GOSSIP      Reaches everyone in the game
GRATS       Congratulates people in the mud. Reaches everyone
SHOUT       Reaches your nearby area
SAY         Reaches your whole room
LISTEN      Listen to mobs for useful information
CHAT        Chat with mobs for useful information
MUSIC       Sing a song or talk about music
GTELL       Group-tell, reaches only members of your group
EMOTE       Expresses your feelings
REPORT      Shows your statistics to your group
MAIL        For use at a postmaster, send mail to anyone in the game

TELL        Tell to any person in the world
WHISPER     Whisper to a person in your current room
SPEAK       Speak in the language of your race

SOCIALS     Shows a complete list of socials

See also: -
#
COMPACT

This command toggles the extra blank line output to your screen after each
command.  Useful if you have a small display.

See also: BRIEF
#
COMPARE

This command allows you to compare one weapon to another or one piece
of armor to another. It's pretty vague and just tells you if the average
dice damage (excluding possible damage bonuses) of one is greater than the 
other (in the case of weapons) or if the base armor value of one piece of
armor is better/worse/no different than another. Its a moderately useful
skill, but the spell "identify" is *FAR* superior.

See also: IDENTIFY, JUDGE
#
"SPELL CONE OF COLD"

Usage       : cast 'cone of cold' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

More powerful than burning hands.  Make that MUCH more.

See Also: BURNING HANDS
#
"SPELL CONJURE ELEMENTAL"

Usage       : cast 'conjure elemental'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell summons one of the elemental powers of air, earth, water or fire
to serve you.

See Also: -
#
CONSIDER

Usage : consider <victim>

Consider compares your offensive and defensive power vs the victim's power.
Your offensive power is simply your average damage with your weapons times
the number of attacks you get.  Your defensive power is your hit points 
(double power if you are sancted).  Consider makes a guess at how hard or
easy a mob might be for you to fight, but it just can't factor in everything!
Mages and clerics especially might finds mobs a lot easier or harder depending
on if they have mana for spells.

Results of consider, from easy to difficult:

Simple, extremely easy, really easy, easy, pretty easy, reasonably easy,
sort of easy, fairly easy, somewhat easy, even, somewhat hard, fairly hard,
sort of hard, reasonably hard, pretty hard, hard, really hard, extremely
hard, getting impossible, impossible, unthinkable.

See Also: -
#
CONSTITUTION

Constitution is a measure of how healthy a player is in a very general sense.
Constitution as an attribute modifies the amount of hit points a player can
get as a bonus when they level.

See Also: ATTRIBUTES
#
"SPELL CONTINUAL" "SPELL CONTINUAL LIGHT"

Usage : cast 'continual light'

This spell makes a temporary light source that can be help by the caster.

See Also: CREATE FOOD, CREATE WATER
#
"SPELL CONTROL WEATHER"

Usage       : cast 'control weather' ('better' | 'worse')
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : -

This spell will change the "course" of the current weather.
Example:

> cast 'control wea' worse

See Also: -
#
CORPSE BODY

Corpses are from killed mobs or mortals.

See Also: DEATH
#
"SPELL CREATE FOOD"

Usage       : cast 'create food'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell instantly creates an edible waybread. The delicious waybread 
will satisfy your hunger for 24 hours.

See Also: CONTINUAL LIGHT, CREATE WATER 
#
"SPELL CREATE SPRING"

Usage       : cast 'create spring'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 10 turns

This spell creates a magical spring on the ground, providing clear water
to all for 10 turns before drying up.

See Also: CREATE WATER
#
"SPELL CREATE WATER"

Usage       : cast 'create water' <drink container>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Expect disasterous results if cast upon a drink container which contains
another liquid than water. Empty or water containers will be filled
depending on the level of the caster.

Double amout of water will be created if it is raining (or worse).

See Also: CONTINUAL LIGHT, CREATE FOOD 
#
CRITICAL "CRITICAL_HIT" "CRITICAL HIT"

Over time and with practice, warriors develop the ability to use their
weapons with extreme skill.  At times they can find openings in the
defense of their opponent and attack a vulnerable location.  These
critical hits inflict a good deal more damage than a standard attack.

See Also: BLOCK, DISARM, RIPOSTE
#

"SPELL CURE BLIND"

Usage       : cast 'cure blind' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell will cure a person blinded by the "blindness" spell, it
can not remove blindness caused by for example cursed items.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL CURE CRITIC"

Usage       : cast 'cure critic' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell cures 5d8 + 3 + 1/4th the clerics level in hitpoints of damage.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL CURE LIGHT"

Usage       : cast 'cure light' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell cures 2d8 + 1 + 1/4th the clerics level in hitpoints of damage.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL CURE POISON"

Heh. You must mean 'remove poison'. A common mistake.

See Also: REMOVE POISON
#
"SPELL CURE SERIOUS"

Usage:      : cast 'cure serious' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell cures 3d8 + 5 + 1/4th the clerics level in hitpoints of damage.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL CURSE"

Usage       : cast 'curse' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Curse cast on a person that fails the saving throw, will reduce the
Damroll by one, and prevent the victim from recalling.

See Also: -
#
CUSTPROMPT

Usage: custprompt <prompt>

This command allows you to customize your Heroes of Kore Prompt (tm). You
can put any text you want in it, as well as the following codes:

$h: Current hit points	    $H: Maximum hit points
$m: Current mana            $M: Maximum mana
$v: Current movement        $V: Maximum movement
$g: Gold on hand            $b: Gold in the bank
$G: Total gold              $l: Current level
$x: Current experience      $X: Experience required for next level
$n: Your name               $$: A dollar sign
$f: Mob you are fighting    $c: Condition of the mob you are fighting
$a: Age                     $p: Current position (resting etc)
$R: Armor Class             $A: Alignment
$S: Strength                $D: Dexterity
$N: Constitution            $I: Intelligence
$W: Wisdom                  $C: Charisma
$t: Hitroll                 $d: Damroll

All the color codes as well as ^^\ (for new line) also work. Typing
'custprompt' without any parameters resets you to the default prompt.

See also: ANSI
#D
DAMAGE

The damage that you do is scaled.. each weapon type has a message and
the damage messages rise in increments of roughly 4 to 6 hit points per range.
It's not constant but after a while you can really tell how good or bad
a weapon is and how much damage it's doing by its damage messages. 

miss		scratch		graze		hit
injure		wound		maul		decimate
devastate	maim		MUTILATE	DISEMBOWEL
EVISCERATE	MASSACRE	DEMOLISH	ANNIHILATE
LIQUIFIES

See Also: -
#
DAMROLL

Your damroll is the amount of extra damage you do in addition to your 
weapon damage with each hit.  You can see your damroll when you type attr 
after 8th level.  It is added only to melee attacks.

See Also : HITROLL
#
DAWN DAY DUSK NIGHT

These times of day really dont have much affect on the game except that 
outdoor rooms at dusk and night are dark for those without a light or infra-
vision.

See Also: -
#
DEAF

(deaf) means that you don't hear shouts.  Toggle it with the noshout command.

See Also: FLAGS, NOSHOUT
#
DEATH DYING RIP

Death is something to be avoided at all costs.  When you die you are
brought back to life, but you lose a portion of your experience.  If
you lose too much experience, there is a chance you can lose a level.

See Also: -
#
DEATHKNIGHT

SPELLNAME               LEVEL  COST
judge                    1   n/a
kick                     1   n/a
bash                     2   n/a
defend                   3   n/a
disarm                   3   n/a
rescue                   3   n/a
berserk                  5   n/a
block                    5   n/a
critical_hit             5   n/a
quickheal                8   n/a
switch                   9   n/a
track                   10   n/a
dual wield              12   n/a
rage                    13   n/a
quickdraw               17   n/a
heal                    18   n/a
riposte                 20   n/a
avenging blow           30   n/a
valour                  30   n/a

See Also: - CLASSES
#
DEATHTRAP DT

Deathtraps are usually obvious traps that not only kill you, but also
destory all your equipment since they are unretrievable from the trap.
No reimburstments are given for deathtraps. Don't even ask. However,
you don't lose any experience for hitting a deathtrap.

However, people who claim they never DT are either liars, wimps, or
twinks.

See Also: TWINK
#
DEATHMATCH DEATHQUEST

Is a special mode in which the arena can be set by an immortal. When in
this mode a mortal doesn't lose experience when they die. Also when in
this mode a mortals don't actually die, they reappear in the temple
restored and a death is added to the totals

We try to run an "official" deathmatch each week.  Currently they are
held on saturday.  The winner of this deathmatch will be flagged as
the DQ Master for the week, and will also receive any item of their
choice to use until the following saturday.  There are additional
rules during these official deathmatches.  You may not follow other
players or group.  You may not recall yourself or others.  And as
always, you must listen and obey the immortal who is running the
quest.

* - You will no longer be dispelled before entering the arena, but
    you will be forced to follow yourself.

See Also: BATTLE, SCORES
#
DEFEND

Defend is a skill much like rescue only better! When you rescue someone,
you take the blows for them but the person you rescue stops fighting and
has to start all over again, losing valuable time and lost hits. Defend
lets the tank take the blows for someone (like rescue) but the person they
defend gets to keep fighting!! You must be wearing a shield in order to
defend successfully.

See Also: RESCUE
#
"SPELL DEFENSIVE HARMONY"

Usage       : cast 'defensive harmony'
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : 24 hours

Defensive harmony grants the powers of armor to all members of caster's
group.

See Also: ARMOR, BARKSKIN
#
DESCRIPTION

Your description (settable on the connection menu) is what people see
when they look at you. They'll also see the equipment you wear, and if
they're a thief they might peek at your inventory.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL DETECT INVISIBILITY"

Usage       : cast 'detect invisibility'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 5 hours per level

This spell enables you to see invisible items and players.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL DETECT MAGIC"
Usage       : cast 'detect magic'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 5 hours per level

This spell will let you see the magical aura surrounding magical
objects.

See Also: -
#
DIAGNOSE

diagnose
diagnose <character>

The DIAGNOSE command tells you how wounded a character looks.  If you are
fighting someone, you can use DIAGNOSE with no arguments to diagnose the
person you're fighting.

> diagnose
> diagnose rasmussen

See Also: -
#
DISARM

Disarm forces the mob a warrior has engaged to unwield its weapon. Disarm is
especially valuable because mobs inflict less damage when they are bare-
handed. Disarm will initiate combat. This skill is ineffective against mobs
protected by Sanctuary.

>disarm
>disarm orc

See Also: BLOCK, RIPOSTE, CRITICAL HIT
#
"SPELL DISINTEGRATE"

Usage       : cast 'disintegrate' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Disintegrate hits the victim with a massive wallop, hopefully making powder
of their body.

See Also: LIGHTNING BOLT 
#
"SPELL DISPEL MAGIC"

Usage       : cast 'dispel magic' <victim> 
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Dispel Magic neutralizes the effects, for good or ill, of spells cast by
mobs or other mortals.  Dispel Magic is ineffective against a mob's inherent
magical powers.

SEE ALSO: DISPEL SANCTUARY
#
"SPELL DISPEL EVIL"

Usage       : cast 'dispel evil' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Special

This spell will only affect evil creatures. An evil person of level
equal or less than caster will suffer 100 damage points.

If the victim is higher level than caster, the spell will inflict
(caster_level)d4 damage points, saving throw versus half damage.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL DISPEL GOOD"

Usage       : cast 'dispel good' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Special

This spell will only affect good creatures. An good person of level
equal or less than caster will suffer 100 damage points.

If the victim is higher level than caster, the spell will inflict
(caster_level)d4 damage points, saving throw versus half damage.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL DISPEL SANCTUARY"

Usage       : cast 'dispel sanctuary' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spell removes the sanctuary from characters only. Mobiles are unaffected
by this spell.

See Also: DISPEL MAGIC 
#
DISPLAY PROMPT

Modify your prompt to show your hit points, mana, movement points,
and/or mob condition.

> display off		Return to normal display
> display all		Display hit, mana, move points, and mob condition
> display color		Show the prompt in color; kinda neat, try it! :)
> display diagnose	Show the condition of the mob you are fighting.


The mob's condition only comes up when you are fighting. In those cases,
it gives you a description of its condition like: "excellent", "bruised",
"awful" - a very handy feature.

Play around with the command, it's pretty self explanitory and there are
*MANY* more options.

See also:  TOGGLE
#
DONATE

The Donate command removes an object you no longer want from your inventory
and deposits the item in the Donation Room west of the Temple Of Vulmarta
in Kore.  You can donate from any room in the game and there is no longer
any chance of the item getting junked.  Donating is an easy way to assist
new players.

Examples:

>donate longsword
>donate all.bread
>donate <number> coins

See Also: JUNK, SACRIFICE, BURY
#
DRAGON

	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@**^^""~~"^@@^*@*@@**@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@*^^'"~   , - ' '; ,@@b. '  -e@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@*^"~      . '     . ' ,@@@@(  e@*@@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@^~         .       .   ' @@@@@@, ~^@@@@@@@@@@@
	@@@~ ,e**@@*e,  ,e**e, .    ' '@@@@@@e,  "*@@@@@'^@
	@',e@@@@@@@@@@ e@@@@@@       ' '*@@@@@@    @@@'   0
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@',e,     ;  ~^*^'    ;^~   ' 0
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@^""^@@e@@@   .'           ,'   .'  @
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@'    '@@@@@ '         ,  ,e'  .    ;@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@' ,&&,  ^@*'     ,  .  i^"@e, ,e@e  @@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@' ,@@@@,          ;  ,& !,,@@@e@@@@ e@@
	@@@@@,~*@@*' ,@@@@@@e,   ',   e^~^@,   ~'@@@@@@,@@@
	@@@@@@, ~" ,e@@@@@@@@@*e*@*  ,@e  @@""@e,,@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@ee@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@" ,e@' ,e@' e@@@@@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@" ,@" ,e@@e,,@@@@@@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@~ ,@@@,,0@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@
	@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@,,@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@@

Dragons are a race of magical creatures.  They have the ability to use a 
breath weapon, fly, can see in the dark, sense living things around them, 
and are known to have tremendous strength.  Dragons are a powerful race, 
and therefore are only available to PC's as a remort option.

See Also: KNIGHT, REMORT, UNDEAD, ANGEL, THRI-KREEN, MONK
# 
DROP

If you lose interest in a carried item, you can drop it on the ground.

drop <item>
drop all.<item>
drop all
drop <number> coins

> drop bottle
> drop all.bread
> drop all
> drop 1000 coins

See also: GET, JUNK, DONATE
#
DROW DARK

Drow are a race of underground dwelling elves. They hate surface elves,
and many other races. They are strong in the arcane arts. They are quick, 
but not very strong or hearty. They can see in the dark and resist magic.

See Also: RACE
#
DRUIDS

Druids are a sect of forest dwelling lore masters.  They are at one with
nature and at home in the forest.  They possess both offensive and defensive 
spells, though usually not as powerful as their mage or cleric counterparts.
They also have the power to summon elementals, as well as unique spells
not found in other classes.

Here is a list of your spells at level 50:

SPELLNAME		LEVEL	COST
barkskin		1	20
scrounge		1	n/a
cure light		3	10
faerie fire		4	10
remove poison		5	50
create food		9	5
create spring		11	5
sneak                   12      n/a
cure serious		15	16
waterwalk		17	25
pass without trace	18	11
mass fly		20	35
acid blast		21	36
hide			22	n/a
refresh			22	20
meditate		24	n/a
stoneskin		25	32
earth elemental		26	100
track			26	n/a
ice storm		30	50
water elemental		32	150
windwalk		33	50
cure critic		35	22
fist of earth		36	50
summon			38	54
air elemental		40	200
fist of stone		41	50
sunray			42	100
mass refresh		43	38
power word stun		45	46
fire elemental		48	250
fire storm		50	80

See Also: CLASSES, SPELLS
#
DUALWIELD "DUAL WIELD"
Warrior only

Warriors level 25 and higher gains the ability to wield a second weapon in
place of a shield.  The second weapon allows the warrior to have 50% more
attacks per round, but requires more strength to wield than the primary
weapon.

See Also: WARRIOR
#
DUERGAR "DARK DWARF"

Duergar are a race of dark dwarves, suited to living deep underground.  They
are inherently evil and shun surface dwellers.

See Also: RACE
#
DWARF DWARVES DWARVEN

Dwarves are a short-statured race who dwell in the mountains. They are a
strong and hearty race who loves the majestic primal beauty of the mountains
(also the gold, silver, and gems within). They have knowledge that time can
only bring since they are a long lived race. They are not very quick. Their
harsh enviroment gives them very little time for personal beauty. 

See Also: RACE
#E 
"SPELL EARTHQUAKE"
Usage       : cast 'earthquake'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for no damage 

This spell will damage everybody except the caster by
1d8+level_of_caster hitpoints.

See Also: -
#
EAT DRINK SIP TASTE FOOD HUNGER THIRST
If you're hungry or thirsty, these commands are for you!

> eat bread
> taste bread
> drink from cup
> sip fountain

See Also: CREATE FOOD, CREATE WATER
#
ANGELS

The angel embodies all that is holy.  These celestial beings are the agents of
the gods of good, sometimes entering the world of men to enforce their deity's
will.  They are rue to do this though as they surrender much of their power
upon entering the mortal plane.  The angel does, however, retain some of its
supernatural resistance to mortal magics.  They are also highly adept with both
weapon and spell, rendering these holy beings extremely potent adversaries.

See Also: REMORT, UNDEAD
#
ELF ELVES

Elves are a woodland race and are quick and intuitive.  They have a 
strong relationship with magic and are fierce when defending their homes 
and forests. They are graceful. However, strength and stamina are not their
main attributes.

See Also: RACE
#
EMAIL E-MAIL

If you supply a valid email address to Heroes of Kore, the immortals will
be able to verify your identity in case you should forget your password. You
can enter an email address via the main menu after you login. If you do not
supply an email address, the immortals WILL NOT be able to help you if you
forget your password.
If you lose your password email the mud from the email you have supplied to
kore@pro-usa.net

See Also: - PASSWORDS
# 
EMOTE :

Show people what you're feeling.  The shorthand is ":".

"emote <string>" will display your name, then the string.  For example,
if your name is "Quifael",

> emote is feeling very sad today.

will display:

Quifael is feeling very sad today.

See also: SOCIALS
#
"SPELL ENCHANT WEAPON"

Usage       : cast 'enchant weapon' <weapon>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Permanent

This spell will enchant non-magical (non-modifying) weapons only.
By non-modifying weapons we refer to weapons that might alter any
ability such as for example damage. The only way to know if a weapon
is suitable for enchantment is to fully identify it.

The spell will modify the weapon depending on the level and int
of the caster.  You'll have to find out exactly how yourself.

See Also: ENCHANT ARMOR
#
"SPELL ENCHANT ARMOR"

Usage       : cast 'enchant armor' <armor>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Permanent

This spell will enchant non-magical (non-modifying) armor only.
By non-modifying armor we refer to armor that might alter any
ability such as for example damage. The only way to know if a armor
is suitable for enchantment is to fully identify it.

The spell will modify the armor depending on the level and int
of the caster.  You'll have to find out exactly how yourself.

See Also: ENCHANT WEAPON

#
"SPELL ENERGY DRAIN"

Usage       : cast 'energy drain' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 13 magic user.
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell does not give much damage, but victims failing their
saving throws will loose up to 40,000 XP points. You will gain
a quarter of this XP.

Beware that this spell is evil.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL ENERGY FLUX"

Usage       : cast 'energy flux' victim
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Level       : Level 50 Magic user.

This spell does not belong to any particular class and is
most often found on potions and staves. It will rejuvinate
nearly 200mana to the person used on.

See Also: -
#
ENTER

If you type 'enter' while you are outdoors, you'll enter any nearby shelter.
You can also follow 'enter' with an argument; for example, 'enter window'.

See Also: LEAVE 
#
EQUIPMENT

Gives you a list of all the equipment you're wearing, holding, and wielding.

See also: INVENTORY
#
EXAMINE

May give you some valuable information about an item.

See Also: LOOK
#
EXITS

Gives you a list of the obvious exits from your location. Of course, the less
obvious ones won't show up here - you have to THINK in order to locate those.

See Also: -
#
EXPERIENCE XP

Whenever you kill a monster or a player, you earn experience points. When
enough experience points are earned, you raise a level.
Things you should know about experience points:

  * When damaging a monster, you get experience points.

  * When killing a monster you get experience points.

  * When grouped with someone, including a mob, experience is divded by 
    level.  See help group for details.

  NOTE: If you are 10 levels lower than the average level for your group,
  you will gain only 1 exp per kill

See Also: GROUP
#
"SPELL FAERIE FIRE"

Usage       : cast 'faerie fire' <victim>
Acculumative: No 
Duration    : 1 hour

This spell increases your victim's armor class, making him easier to
hit. This spell conjures a ball of faerie so intense, that the victim
is not aware of what the caster is doing.

See Also: -
#
FAMOUS

Make Me Famous - This will consist of mobs that don't belong. Meaning
mobs you don't see on the mud everyday. Famous mobs and everyday pain
in the ass mobs. Each one will have a ticket that is worth points. 
Kill the mob get the ticket save for prizes. 

Rules - 
1) The mobs that have the orange tickets are for the low level players.
   Level 25 and under. ANYONE with a orange ticket over level 25 will
   be slayed. This is to give the lower levels a change to be involved
   in the quest.
2) Mobs will be placed randomly in the mud. You can not track them and
   no I will not give you the names of them. You will have to go out
   and find them. 
3) Only one mob will have a red ticket that is worth 250 points.
4) There will be no bitching and or complaining.
5) Quest will run until all tickets are found or 11pm est which ever is
   sooner.
6) All tickets must be turned in by 11pm. If you have to leave etc it
   is best you claim your prize prior to leaving.
7) Top four prizes only one of each is available. Get your tickets
   redeemed early.
8) Above is subject to change at any time it deems fit.

Tickets -
red - 250pts    yellow - 50pts    blue - 40pts     green - 30pts 
purple - 20pts      orange - 10pts

  Points  Prize
1) 400     blood leggings - (dam hit)
2) 500     hematite ring - (mana wis int, svs hps) 
3) 450     shoufa - (svp svr svp svb svs)
4) 600     blade master gauntlets - (dex str mana hps hit dam)
5) 250     thick leather belt (con)
6) 200     jade ring (con)
7) 300     pretitle
8) 50      shiny token
9) 30      gold token
#
"SPELL FEEBLEMIND"

Usage       : cast 'feeblemind' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 1 hour

Reduces the intelligence of the victim.

See Also: -
#
FILL

If you want to fill a container you're holding with liquid from a fountain
in the same room as you.

> fill canteen fountain

See also: POUR
#
"SPELL FIND FAMILIAR"

Usage       : cast 'find familiar'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Special

This spell will call out and summon an animal to the caster.  The caster 
is then able to bond with the animal and control its body.  Return to
the original body by typing 'return'.

See Also : MAGIC JAR, RETURN
#
"SPELL FIREBALL"

Usage       : cast 'fireball' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell is more powerful than burning hands, and about as powerful as
cone of cold.

See Also: BURNING HANDS, CONE OF COLD 
#
"SPELL FIRE SHIELD" "SPELL FIRESHIELD"

Usage       : cast 'fire shield'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : 3-6 rounds

Fireshield surrounds the caster with a shield of protective fire.  Anyone
trying to physically attack the caster will suffer damage back to themselves
as a result.

See Also:
#
"SPELL FIRE STORM"

Usage       : cast 'fire storm' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Fire storm calls down a inferno of fire from the heavens, burning all
nonfriendly mobs in the area.  It is the most powerful area affect
spell for a druid.

See Also: ICE STORM
#
"SPELL FIST OF EARTH"

Usage       : cast 'fist of earth' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

This spells causes the ground to transform into a fist that crushes the
victim mercilessly.

See Also: FIST OF STONE
#
"SPELL FIST OF STONE"

Usage       : cast 'fist of stone' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Fist of stone is a more powerful version of fist of earth.  Maybe because
stone is harder than earth? :)

See Also: FIST OF EARTH
#
FLAGS

Players sometimes have FLAGS after their names in the WHO list.  These
flags are always in parentheses, not brackets or braces.

FLAG        MEANING
----------- ---------------------------------------------------------
(KILLER)    Player is trying to kill other players.  That means you
	    can kill him/her without being flagged.  Killer never
            hits a target.
(THIEF)     Player is trying to steal from other players.  Fire away.
(invis)     Player is invisible; you can see him/her because you are
	    sensitive to the presence of invisible things.
(writing)   Player is writing on the board; do not disturb.
(mailing)   Player is writing mail; do not disturb.
(deaf)	    Player has chosen not to hear shouts.
(notell)    Player has chosen not to accept tells.
(quest)     Player is participating in a quest currently being run by
	    the Gods.
(editing)   Immortal is building new areas with the online editor; do
            not disturb.

See also:  STEAL, VISIBLE, NOSHOUT, NOTELL, QUEST
#
FLEE
If you are in a fight and things are beginning to get a little uncomfortable
(maybe your are dying), just type 'flee', and presto! you are out of harm's way
- that is, IF there is a suitable exit nearby, and IF that exit doesn't simply
bring you from the ashes to the fire... but then, who wants to live forever?

See Also: WIMPY 
#
"SPELL FLY"

Usage       : cast 'fly' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : level/2 hours

Causes the victim to start flying, allowing passage over water and travel at
reduced cost to movement points.

See Also: WATERWALK
#
FOLLOW

Use FOLLOW to automatically follow someone else.  You may only follow
someone who is within 10 levels of you.

> follow ras
> follow self

See Also: GROUP
#
"SPELL FORGET"

Usage       : cast 'forget' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous
Saving Throw: Versus spell for no effect

You can cast forget on a mob to make it forget that you attacked it.

See Also: -
#
FRENCH

Don't you know how they kiss in France?? -- try it!

See Also: SOCIALS
#G
"SPELL GATE ONE" "SPELL GATE TWO" "SPELL GATE THREE"

Usage       : cast 'gate [one|two|three]'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

The three levels of gate, one, two and three, summon progressivly more
powerful demons, from the lowly and cringing Vrock to the large, bold and
fearless Glabrezu!
A very powerful spell, but a word of caution: Clerics with low charisma may
find that while the mob does come when called, it arrives Very Angry and
completely out of control! And with the very mage that made it so angry
right there in the same place as it!
Beware! Infernal Powers are not mastered by the weak!

See Also: -
#
GAUGE

Thief skill, allows them gauge a mob's weaknesses and thus increase damroll.
If failed the mob will sense the evil intention and attack.

See Also: DAMROLL
#
GET TAKE
If you find something interesting on the ground, you may use 'get' to pick
it up.  'get' can also be used to extract items from containers.

> get sword corpse
> get all corpse
> get all all.bag
> get all.bread all.bag

See Also: DROP, PUT
#
GIANT GIANTS

Giants are a huge and powerful race. They resemble very tall and large 
humans. They do not make friends easily, but once they have given their 
friendship, they will never abandon a friend in need, no matter the danger.  
They are very strong and very hearty race. However, they are not too
intelligent and often lack common sense. Due to their size, they are somewhat
slow. They can't see in the dark; they can often "feel" the presense of people
behind them.

See Also: RACE
# 
GIVE
If you feel benevolent, you may give some stuff to someone in need.

give <object> <victim>
give <number> coins <victim>

> give all ras
> give bread onivel
> give all.bronze romulus
> give 400 coins aramina

See Also: -
#
GNOMES

Gnomes are a race of subterranean dwelling creatures.  They enjoy mining
precious gems and working with stone.  They have the innate ability to see
in the dark.  Their closeness with the earth and their dedicated work ethic
allows them to make excellent clerics and mages.

See Also : RACE
#
GAZE

An undead skill where the undead attempt to gaze at a target for death.
This is effective to varying degrees dependant on the mobs level.
This may also have other affects on a mob other then death.

See Also: UNDEAD
#
GRAB HOLD
For getting a good grip on something; a torch, for example.

> hold torch
> grab stone

See Also: WEAR, WIELD, EQUIPMENT, REMOVE
#
GRATS CONGRATS CONGRADULATIONS

The grats channel lets you cheer on your friends!!
ie:
Superior congrats, 'Go Zippo!'

See Also: -
#
GROUP

Usage : GROUP <player>
        GROUP all

GROUP with no arguments shows the status of your group.  GROUP <player>
adds or removes <player> from your group.  GROUP ALL adds everyone who is
following you to your group.

If you are a group member, then you will share experience points for killing
monsters among the group. Experience points will only be shared among
group members that are in the same location, at the time of the killing
blow. Sharing is regardless of wherther the group members have been
participating in the fight.

When grouped experience is divided as follows:
The levels of the people are added together to get a number.  The 
experience gained from killing a mob is divided by the number of total 
levels in the group to determine the value of one share of the 
experience.  Then each group member receives one share per level.  So if 
a level 5, a level 3, and a level 2 PC were grouped together and killed a 
mob worth 1,000 exp, the 1,000 would be divided by 10 (the sum of levels 
in the group 5+3+2) to equal 100.  So 100 is the value of each share.  
Therefore the level 5 would get 500 pts. (5*100), the level 3 would get 
300, and the level 2 would get 200.


Group with no argument shows a list of people with whom you are grouped.
"group all" groups all people who are following you.

To make a group, a "leader" must be selected. All members of the group
must then "follow" the leader using the follow command. The leader should
NOT follow anyone at all! The leader can now toggle group membership for
each player in the group, by using "group <player_name>". The leader
should remember to include himself in the group.

Example:

Quifael and Redferne wishes to group with Dragon.

Quifael : "follow dragon"
Redferne: "follow dragon"
(Dragon should be following no one but himself)
Dragon  : "group dragon"
Dragon  : "group redferne"
Dragon  : "group quifael"

Later when Dragon get upset at Quifael (because he is sleeping all the time)
he types : "Group Quifael" to kick Quifael out of the group.

See Also: XP, EXPERIENCE, UNGROUP
#
"SPELL GROUP HEAL"

Usage       : cast 'group heal'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Group Heal heals everyone in the same group (and room) of the caster. It
heals just as much as the Heal spell does.

SEE ALSO: HEAL
#
"SPELL GROUP RECALL"

Usage       : cast 'group recall'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Group Recall recalls every member of the casters group who occupy the room
where the spell is cast if the caster is the leader of the group.  If the 
caster is not the leader, only the members listed above the caster on the
group list, and the caster, will recall.

SEE ALSO: GROUP, RECALL 
#
"SPELL GROUP SANCTUARY"

Usage       : cast 'group sanctuary'
Accumulative:
Duration    : 3 + level/10 hours

Casts Sanctuary upon each member of the casters group.

SEE ALSO: GROUP, SANCTUARY
#
GSAY GTELL

Tell something to all the members of your group, even if they're not in the
room.

See Also: GROUP
#H
HALFELF HALF-ELF HALF

Half-elves are a cross breed of elves and humans.  They are able to grow facial
hair and have extended life spans.  Their elven features are unmistakable.  
Half elves have good dexterity and their long lifespans permit them to be very
studious.  They make fine warriors, mages, and thieves. 

See Also: RACE
#
"SPELL HARM"

Usage       : cast 'harm' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

By invoking the true name of his or her deity, a cleric can inflict
serious physical damage on the victim.  It is one of the more powerful
offensive spells in a cleric's arsenal.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL HASTE"

Usage       : cast 'haste' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Varies

Haste increases the recipients attack speed.

See Also: INSTILL ENERGY, SLOW
#
"SPELL HEAL"

Usage       : cast 'heal' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Heal is a more powerful spell than Cure Light or Cure Critical. The 
amount of damage heal can cure is dependent on the level of the caster,
up to 204 hit points per heal by a level 50 cleric.

See Also: -
#
HELP

Following help is available:

HELP help       - This text.
HELP            - A list of some of the most useful commands.

Help searches for a partial match of the entered word, including any
spaces that may follow the word.

Example:
> 'help spell magic mis'
    will find the help text for the magic missile spell.

> 'help spell mag '
   will not match anything.

> 'help mag'
   will match 'magic user'.

See also: COMMANDS
#
HERO

The hero flag on an item requires that the wearer be at least level 35 to
use that item.

See Also: VETERAN CHAMPION
#
HIDE

Thieves Only.
When you type hide there is a chance that you hide in the room. If hidden
you can only be "sensed" by the "sense life" spell. Even if sensed your
identity will remain hidden. Hide is broken by pressing return, regardless
of wherther you typed a command or not.

Example:

> hide
Ok.
>  (you wait for ex. 5 mins and remain hidden for 5 mins)

>  (You pressed enter and no longer hide)

See Also: -
#
HITROLL

Your hitroll is you bonus chance to hit with each melee strike.  The 
hitroll is added to your roll to hit and then subtracts the opponent's AC 
to see if you are successful.

See Also : DAMROLL AC
#
"HIT POINT" HP

Hit point is a measurement of your current health.  When hit point reaches
zero, you die.  Fighters have excellent hit points; clerics, bards, and
thieves have fair hit points; and mages are weak in hit points.  Hit points
can be restored by sleeping, resting, or healing spells.  Warriors and
thieves have the quickheal skill which enhances healing.

See Also: MANA, MOVEMENT, DEATH, SLEEP, REST, HEAL, QUICKHEAL
#
HOBBIT 

Hobbits are a small race who love creature comforts. They love good food,
friends, and banter. They rather stay near their homes and live contently.
The rare adventurers are considered strange and somewhat pitied. Due to their
size and life style, they are not very strong, but however they are very
quick and nimble. They can see in the dark; they move gracefully and quietly.

See Also: RACE
#
"SPELL HOLY LIGHT"

Usage       : cast 'holy light'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Holy light grants the powers of aid to all members of caster's group.

See Also: AID
#
HOMEPAGE WEBPAGE

Heroes of Kore webpage is located at :

http://www.tiamats-lair.com/kore

#
HOUSES

Houses will be sold by auction only. Their features change with each sale,
so watch for those on the house auction board that will appear irregularly
in the city of Kore.

See Also: -
#
HOTLINE

Welcome to the Immortal Hotline. If you wish to talk to a Immortal please
listen carefully to the following directions. Then leave your message at
the prompt.

-If you have a nervous disorder, just fidget in front of the screen until
 a Immortal becomes visable.

-If you are obsessive-compulsive, press 7 repeatedly at the main meun.

-If you are co-dependent, please ask someone to press 7 for you.

-If you have multipe peronalities, press ctrl, alt, delete buttons.

-If you are delusional, press the esc button and it will transfer you the
 little people in zone 8.

-If you are schizophrenic, listen carefully, and the voices will tell you
 what buttons to press.

-If you are paranoid, we know who you are. Stay online so we can finish
 tracing your IP.

-If you have amnesia, leave your char name, race, and class and password.

BEEP
#
HUMAN

Humans are the most common race.  They are well-rounded and able to be 
any class.

See Also: RACE
#
HYPER-REGEN

This is a roomflag found in Kore that promotes mana regeneration and hps
regeneration.

See Also: -
#I
"SPELL ICE STORM"

Usage       : cast 'ice storm' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Ice storm calls forth a meteoric shower of hail to strike all nonfriendly
mobs in the area.

See Also: FIRE STORM
#
IMMORTALS

Immortals are people who assist the implementors in running the mud. They
build areas, interact with players, and come up with ideas to improve the
mud. They're also known to read the boards and complain a lot for no good
reason.

See Also: IMPLEMENTORS
# 
IMPLEMENTORS

The implementors of Kore are Culvan, Karn, Kasmir and Zirnozz. They 
are assisted by a host of immortals, all of whom are important. You should
know though, if you really want to change the game, it helps to know how to 
suck up to the imps.

^GCulvan^n: likes anything that makes the code simpler and things that make life
easier to administrate.
^GKarn^n: like the immlist says (or at least it used to), he breaks things.
^GKasmir^n: likes tricky mobs that hit hard but also awards the player with
great equipment.
^GZirnozz^n: likes tricky mobs that hit hard but only laughs when the players
die repeatedly.

See Also: IMMORTALS, WIZLIST
#
"SPELL IDENTIFY"

Usage       : cast 'identify' [object]
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Identify gives information on an object, like what a potion when drunk will
do, or what is contained on a scroll.

See Also: -
#
NEWS POLICY CREDITS VERSION

These commands show you important information about CircleMUD. It is a good
idea to read them every once in a while.

info     - useful information about the game for beginners
news     - latest changes to the code and areas
policy   - policies on topics like playerkilling
credits  - the people who made CircleMUD possible!
version  - displays the current CircleMUD version number

See Also: -
#
INFORMATION INFO
There is a wealth of commands that can be used to find out more about the
world:

SCORE        Shows much info about your character
AFFECT       Shows the spells affecting your character
WHERE        Shows players in the current area
WHO          Shows all players in the game
TIME         Shows the MUD time
WEATHER      Shows the weather

POLICY       Shows the current MUD policy/rules

COMMANDS     Lists all available commands
SOCIALS      Lists all available socials
LEVELS       Lists the levels of your class and their titles
AREAS        Lists all open game areas
WIZLIST      Shows a list of administrators of this MUD
IMMLIST      Shows a list of all immortals and their duties
CHANGES      Shows a list of current code changes
AREAHELP     Displays information on documented areas
CLANHELP     Displays much information on various clan-related topics

^BNOTE: to get help on a spell, prefix it with "spell" (e.g. HELP SPELL
CHILL TOUCH)^n

See also: RACES, REMORT
#
"SPELL INFRAVISION"

Usage       : cast 'infravision' <victim> 
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 12 hours plus level

Allows the caster to see as if they had a light source.

See Also: -
#
INN INNS CRYOGENIC CRYO RECEPTION RECEPTIONIST CRYOGENICIST
Inns are places where the weary traveler may rest while the innkeeper looks
after his equipment and treasure.
#
"SPELL INSECT PLAGUE"
Usage       : cast 'insect plague'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : -

Insect plague summons a swarm of nasty bugs that movee to the caster's will.
They act as if they were one unified creature in terms of combat and death.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL INSPIRE"
Usage       : cast 'inspire' <victim>
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : -

Inspire increases damroll of the inspired, allowing for harder hits.
The higher the level of the caster, the greater the effect of inspire.

See Also: BATTLE HYMN
#
"SPELL INSTILL ENERGY"

Usage       : cast 'instill energy'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Instill energy grants the powers of haste to the caster's entire group.

See Also: HASTE 
#
INSTRUMENT MUSIC

Bards have to wield their instrument in order to cast spells.

See Also: BARDS
#
INVENTORY

If you're uncertain about what you're carrying, or simply want to check
that no thieves have got to your backpack.

See also: EQUIPMENT
#
"SPELL INVISIBLE STALKER"
Usage       : cast 'invisible stalker'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : -

Invisible stalker summons an invisible servant to do your bidding. Because
you can't see the servant to give it orders (normally) you will have to make
sure that you can see invisible in order to command the servant properly.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL INVISIBILITY"

Usage       : cast 'invisibility' <victim | object>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24 hours, permanent on objects.

Self Explanatory.
Attacking while invisible will immediately break the spell.

See Also: DETECT INVISIBILITY
#J
JUDGE

Usage       : judge <armor | weapon>

Allows warriors to judge armor and weapons.

See Also: COMPARE
#
JUNK

Use JUNK instead of DROP if you want to keep the world a little cleaner.  If
you JUNK something, it will disappear and you'll get a few coins or experience
points, just as if you had dropped it in the dump.

donate <object>
donate <number> coins

> junk cup
> junk all.bronze
> junk 500 coins

See also: DROP, DONATE
#K
KEYS

Keys are used to lock doors, chests, and othersuchlike objects. Most of the
time the locks that the keys lock can be picked by a thief. Other times 
though, the lock is pickproof and only the key can open it. 
Keys are used to help keep areas behind doors more easily accessed by thieves,
sometimes though, it might be easier to steal a key from the inventory of a
mob. Other times, clever mobs will hold the key, or hold a bag with a key
in it (arg! you can't steal from held!)
Most keys are no-rent and have some sort of limit on the number allowed in
the game. If you can't find a key to an area, you might ask on the gossip
channel if someone has it. Chances are its out there... you might try
the spell 'locate object' to find the key too. Mostly, keys that open a 
locked door are found in the same zone the door they open is in. Unfortunately,
there's no way to tell, short of long experience on the mud, what door a 
given key opens.... you'll just have to try them all.

See also: THIEF, PICK, LOCKS, STEAL, LOCATE OBJECT
#
KICK

Fighters and Bards only.
The success of a kick depends upon how well you are learned. The higher
level you reach the harder you kick. There is one small catch -- whenever
you kick (or miss) you will be unable to type any command for three 
rounds of 'Violence' -- so be sure that you do not need to flee!

See Also: RESCUE, BASH
#
KILL HIT
A good way to start a fight. Not a good idea to hit other players.

See Also: MURDER 
#
KING

King of the Ring (battle ring) is a four level maze. At the end of each
maze is a crystal gateway you enter it to get to the next level. On the
fourth and last level is the gateway to King of the Ring, first clan to
have a person to get there wins.

Here is the rules of do's and don't for tonights King of the Ring quest.
Any question not answered here ask an immortal.

Do's

- Clan members may group
- You may be summoned back into the arena after death. You may not be
  summoned back to a level higher then what you was on. If no one is left
  alive in your clan will be transes you back to the arena, however you
  will have to restart at level one of the battle arena.
- You can kill other clans to keep them from reaching the top.
- You may use different chars as long as they are in the same clan and
  not logged in at same time. It will be ok to summon them into the arena
  as long as it is not to a higher level then what the other char was on.
- You may heal and spellup your clannies.
  
Don't

- Do not sleep people in the arena.
- You are not allowed to play for more then one clan.
- No bitchin is allowed. You will die.
- No track bot's are allowed. FYI rooms are !track.
- DO NOT recall anyone unless they are in YOUR clan.
- Unless they are in your clan DO NOT summon others back into arena.
- DO NOT summon others from within the arena that includes your own
  clannies. IE - You are on level 4 a clannie is on level 3. Don't
  summon him or don't summon blah from another clan to PK him.
- DO NOT USE relocate.

Tip's

- Good idea to remove all death junk eq.
- Good idea to remove all clan eq.
- If you die you will lose exp and may delevel. Die alot you
  will lose levels.
- If you are summoned back into the arena and you start over you will
  receive a full restore.

Prize will be determined by the turnout of clans/people etc..

Anyone who is not in a clan may join in, however you will be on your own.
No one is to help you and you are not allowed to help any one clan. This
is a clan event and unless you are in a clan there will be no prize if
you win.

Anyone caught breaking any of these rules or finding something else not
mentioned above that is wrong will have to deal with me. If you have to
think if something is wrong. It is.

#
KISS
Well can't you guess?

See Also: SOCIALS
#
KNIGHTS

Knights are warriors who have completed a long and difficult training
to become truly powerful beings.  They possess superb attacks, massive hit
points, and the ability to heal themselves and others.  They are available
to players only as a remort option and are currently unavailable.

See Also: DRAGONS, REMORT, UNDEAD, ANGEL, THRI-KREEN
#
"SPELL KNOCK"
Usage       : cast 'knock'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : lasts until reset

Knock is a powerful spell that allows mages to magically unlock all of the
doors around them. *click*!!

See Also: WIZARD LOCK
#
KORE

Kore is a mythical place in the middle of the great continent of Arda. All
around its edges, Kore is ringed by cities and hemmed in by danger. A Tyrant
now rules Kore with an iron fist, having replaced and erased the memory of
the previous king of Kore.

#L
LANGUAGE

Each race except human speaks its own language, and also common.

See Also: SPEAK
#
LAUGH

No one is allowed to laugh without the express permission by an 
Implementor.

See Also: LAUGH2
#
LAUGH2

The LAUGH helpfile is a joke, don't get too pissy with us. :P

See Also:  TWINK, BARNEY, RENANDSTIMPY
#
LEAVE

If you feel claustrophobic, typing 'leave' will make you use the nearest
obvious exit to the outside.

See Also: ENTER
#
LEVELS

Lists the levels of your class.  See those cool titles!

See Also: -
#
"SPELL LIGHTNING BOLT"

Usage       : cast 'lightning bolt' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell is more powerful than the color spray spell.

See Also: COLOR SPRAY 
#
LINK

A lot of players have problems with their links to the game.  This can be
very hazardous to your health in the middle of a battle, of course.

 I. If your link is broken, you will automatically attempt to flee each
    time someone attempts to hit you.  If you manage to flee, then you
    will be saved by divine forces, and put in a safe place until you
    reconnect to the game.

II. If your link jams (freezes), you have a problem.  The only solution we
    can give is that you break your link as quickly as possible.  By
    breaking the link you can hope that the above procedure is initiated.

    Do not try to get out of a fight by breaking link.  You will be not
    reimbursed for any experience or equipment if you purposefully
    cut your link.

See Also: WIMPY
#
LIST

If you'd like to see what items a shop has for sale, take a look at the
list.  The list contains all of the items currently for sale and in
what quantity.  The price for each item is also listed.  If you are
interested in a particular type of item, you can specify which items to
list.
 
Examples:
 
> list             (list all items for sale)
> list sword       (list all swords for sale)
 
See Also: SHOPS, BUY, SELL, VALUE
#
LISTEN

This is a social.

BUT, some mobs react when they know that you're listening to them!

See Also: CHAT
#
"SPELL LOCATE OBJECT"
Usage       : cast 'locate object' <object>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

If possible you will know exactly where an object is, or the
name of the person using it. If more than one object by the
same name exists, you will get a listing of several objects.
The maximum number of objects you can simultaneously locate is
your level divided by 2.

See Also: -
#
LOOK
For studying your surroundings. Examples:
look                                      
look AT the angel
look IN the bag
look to the south   (or just: look south)

Note that if you LOOK AT CORPSE you will not see its inventory.
To see what's inside a container (i.e. a corpse) use LOOK IN <OBJECT>.

See Also: EXAMINE, READ
#M
"SPELL MAGIC JAR"

Usage       : cast 'magic jar' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Magic Jar is similar to Charm Person, but more sophisticated and powerful.
Mages who succesfully cast Magic Jar enter and control the mob from within
while their original bodies remain out of harm's way and autoflee if attacked.
Mages return to their original bodies when the mob they've jarred dies,
or by typing return.  Magic Jar is ineffective against mobs protected by
sanctuary.  Mobs of a sufficiently high level are immune to the spell.

See Also: FIND FAMILIAR, POLICY, RETURN, SANCTUARY 
#
"SPELL MAGIC MISSILE"
Usage       : cast 'magic missile' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This is the least powerful offensive magic user spell.

See Also: -
#
"MAGIC USER" WIZARD MAGES "MAGIC-USER"
This is the class of powerful and violent magic, with spells that directly
affect the outside world, usually in the form of offensive magic that
strikes against an enemy.  Mages also possess many spells that extend their
senses magically.  Unfortunately, mages are not masters of the inner magic
and therefore cannot bless, aid, or heal themselves.

Here is a list of your spells at level 50:

SPELLNAME		LEVEL	COST
continual light		1	5
magic missile		1	10
armor			2	10
clairvoyance		2	20
aerial servant		3	30
burning hands		4	15
faerie fire		4	10
find familiar		5	40
detect magic		6	10
invisibility		6	30
feeblemind		7	10
detect invisibility	8	15
sense life		8	20
strength		9	25
meditate		10	n/a
pass without trace	12	10
shocking grasp		12	15
locate object		13	30
animate dead		15	51
waterwalk		15	25
chill touch		16	16
wizard lock		17	50
teleport		18	25
sleep			19	25
energy drain		20	25
mass invis		20	41
monster summoning one	20	50
identify		21	25
invisible stalker	22	50
infravision		23	25
forget			24	21
fly			25	21
color spray		26	21
blindness		27	26
mana shell		28	125
curse			29	30
enchant armor		30	77
cone of cold		31	50
conjure elemental	32	102
monster summoning two	32	100
lightning bolt		34	50
haste			35	75
fireball		36	50
web			37	25
dispel magic		38	50
enchant weapon		38	150
monster summoning three	39	150
chain lightning		40	50
disintegrate		42	60
fireshield              43      100
petrify			45	100
knock                   46      80
magic jar		48	200
word of death		48	100
relocate		49	50
instill energy		50	200

See Also: CLASSES, SPELLS 
#
SEND MAIL CHECK RECEIVE

The commands used by the Kore Mail System (KMS) are MAIL, CHECK, and
RECEIVE.  These commands can only be used while in an Official MMS Post
Office.

To write mail to Quifael:
> mail quifael

To check and see if you have any mail waiting:
> check

To ask the Postmaser to give you your mail, if you have any waiting:
> receive

Stamps cost 150 coins.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL MANA SHELL"

Usage       : cast 'mana shell'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 6 rounds

Mana shell is one of the more powerful spells any mage can use.  It is one
of the rare defensive spells employed by magic users.  By channeling the
One Power in a shield surrounding himself, a mage can actually cause it
to absorb damage.  The effort is tiresome, and the damage absorbed will
directly impact the mage's ability to continue to channel.

See Also:
#
MANA MP

Mana is a measurement of spell power that you currently have. Mana is only
meaningful for spellcasters obviously. Higher level mages have more mana, but
they also have spells that cost more mana. Mana slowly regenerates as time
passes and regenerates faster if the caster rests and is well fed.

See Also: HIT POINT, MOVEMENT, SPELL  
#
MINOTAUR MINOTAURS

Minotaurs are a powerful race of half-man and half-bull. They are brutally
strong and hearty, but they lack foresight and vision. Due to their horrid
appearance, they are not easily welcomed in the human dominated world.
They can see in the dark; they can sense creatures around them.

See Also: RACE
#
"SPELL MASS FLY"

Usage       : cast 'mass fly'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Casts the spell Fly on the entire group, providing they're in the same
room of the caster.

See Also: FLY
#
"SPELL MASS INVIS"
Usage       : cast 'mass invis'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Renders an entire group invisible.

See Also: INVISIBILITY
#
"SPELL MASS REFRESH"

Usage       : cast 'mass refresh'
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Casts refresh on an entire group.

See Also: REFRESH
#
MEDITATE

Meditate increases the amount of mana clerics and mages regenerate each tick.
Meditate is automatically implemented by the game.  Player must be 
resting to meditate.

See Also: REST 
#
"SPELL MIRROR IMAGE"

Usage       : cast 'mirror image'
Accumulative: No (see below)
Duration    : Lasts until dispelled by blows in combat (see below)

Mirror image summons between 6 to 10 images of the spell caster. Each image
will absorb one blow in combat before it is dispelled. A caster can cast the
spell again when they already have images in order to replace the number of
images they have with perhaps a higher number.

See Also: -
# 
"SPELL MONSTER SUMMONING ONE" "SPELL MONSTER SUMMONING TWO" "SPELL MONSTER SUMMONING THREE"

Usage       : cast 'monster summoning <one|two|three>'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

These spells summon a goblin, an ogre and a minotaur respectively, to fight
for you as a servant. They can be equipped and healed and make great
fighting machines. Don't abandon them though! They hate that!

See Also: -
#
MOTD

The motd command allows you to reread the message of the day (the same
message on the connection menu... didn't you read?)

See Also: -
#
MOVEMENT MOVE MOVING
The following commands are used to travel around in the game:
N, NE, NW, E, S, SE, SW, W, U, D: Lets you move in that direction

LOOK     Essential for examining your surroundings
SCAN     For quickly looking into surrounding rooms
SEARCH   Search your room for hidden items

OPEN/CLOSE:  Opens a door or a container
LOCK/UNLOCK: Locks a door or a container. Requires a key
ENTER/LEAVE: Enter doors, portals, etc.

VIS      Become visible, cancelling effects of sneak, hide, invisbility
         etc.
EXITS    Shows you where the exits in the current room lead to
RENT     For use in the receptions of inns. When you re-enter, you will 
         start where you rented

STAND    Lets you wake up and stand up
REST     Lets you sit down; resting characters regenerate faster
SLEEP    Lets you sleep; you regenerate even faster, but have no vision
WAKE     Lets you wake up (or wake another character)

See also: -
#
MV

Movement measures your endurance in terms of the distance you can travel
before having to rest.  When movement reaches zero, you can no longer
move; if you are attacked without enough movement, you cannot flee.
Different terrains reduce movement points by different amount.  The spell
"Fly" enables the player to move at a reduced cost to movement points.

See Also: HIT POINT, MANA, FLEE, FLY
#
MULTIPLAYING

No multiplaying. You may have multiple characters here, but they are to
have no interaction with one another.  This includes dropping link with
one character to log in another character. This also includes using one
character to weaken a mob and logging in another character to kill it for
the exp or items.  The ONLY people allowed to use two characters at the
same time are Gods (level 58 and above). All others will be warned, dis-
connected, frozen, or sitebanned, depending on the circumstances.
#
MURDER

Kill command to hit another player.  To avoid accidental flagging (i.e.
trying to type "kiss redferne" but accidentally typing "kill redferne")
Note that it is illegal to kill other players.  If you try you will get
a KILLER flag.  If you are flagged as a killer, you are unable to do
damage and other players will be allowed to use the MURDER command to
kill you without being flagged themselves.

See also:  FLAGS, FORGIVE
#N
NAMES
When choosing a name, please try to choose one which is both medieval
and unique.  Good names help add to gameplay and will allow you to forge
an identity for yourself.  Simply put, your name should NOT be:

 - Nonsensical, unpronounceable or ridiculous.
 - Profane or derogatory as interpreted in any language.
 - Futuristic or common, such as 'Jill' or 'Laser'.
 - Similar to that of any Heroes of Kore Immortal, major mob, or equipment.
 - Significant in history, mythology, or any religion.
 - Comprised of various capital letters, such as 'BrACkkA' or 'CORTO'.
 - Comprised of ranks or titles, such as 'Lord' or 'Master'.
 - Composed of singular descriptive nouns, adverbs or adjectives,
   as in 'Heart', 'Big', 'Flying', 'Broken', 'Slick' or 'Tricky'.
 - Any of the above in reverse, i.e., writing Jade as 'Edaj'.
 - Any combination of singular descriptive nouns/adverbs or adjectives,
   as in 'Metaljacket Heartbound Earthstone or Softheart'.

If caught with a name similar to the one above, you will most likely have
your character frozen.  There is a reason we ask you when you first create
a character, and if you don't take the warning seriously, expect the
consequences.

See also:  POLICY
#
NEWBIES

Admittedly, newbies have it rough in Kore. 
Look for equipment flagged newbie in Kore, they are only usable by players
level 15 and under.

A few hints and tips for the newbie.

^GNewbie Training^n - 
   go 3 south 1 west 1 down from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GRenting^n -
   go 1 south 1 east up from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GFood^n -
   go 5 south 2 east 1 north from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GBoards (social, trade)^n -
   go 1 north 1 east from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GQuesting^n -
   go 1 north 1 west from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GDonation Room^n -
   go 1 west from Temple of the Goddess of Vulmarta.
^GJitter Park^n -
   go 5 south 6 east 1 north 1 northeast from the Goddess of Vulmarta

^GWear commands for eq^n -
  wear, hold, wield

Make sure you read the help names file. You will be asked to make a new
char if your name does not follow the help file. Also no levels will
be given back if we don't catch the name right away.

See also:  AREAS, TWINK
#
NO

Means no No NO nO no. Never ever NO!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

#
NOREPEAT

This command toggles whether or not you see your communication echoed
back to you (i.e., from commands such as SAY, SHOUT, GOSSIP, etc.)
Useful if you have a slow connection or if it just annoys you.

See Also: SAY, GSAY, TELL, SHOUT, HOLLER
#
NORTH SOUTH EAST WEST UP DOWN
To walk in a given direction.

See Also: -
#
NOSHOUT

NOSHOUT toggles whether or not you hear shouts.  (deaf) will appear after
your name in the WHO list.

See also: FLAGS, SHOUT, WHO
#
NOSUMMON
Due to problems we've had with players killing other players by summoning
them to Bad Places, all characters now have SUMMON PROTECTION turned on by
default.  This prevents people from summoning you and gives you a warning
message if someone tries.  If you want to let someone summon you (i.e. if
someone wants to summon you for a legitamate reason), type NOSUMMON to turn
off summon protection.  You can then type NOSUMMON again to turn protection
back on.

See Also: TOGGLE
#
NOTELL

Use NOTELL if you wish to prevent other players from using "tell" to
communicate with you.  (notell) will appear after your name in the WHO
list if you have notell on.

See Also: FLAGS, TELL, WHO, TOGGLE
#O
OBJECTS
Following commands are used to manipulate objects:

GET       Pick up something or take it out of a container
DROP      Drops an item
GIVE      Give gold or objects away
DONATE    Donates an item to the Temple Donation Room
JUNK      Recycle your items!
WEAR      Wear an item
HOLD      Hold an item. Wands and staves require holding to be used
REMOVE    Removes items from your person
SAC       Sacrifice a corpse on the ground

Using objects:

EAT/TASTE Eats some food
DRINK/SIP Drinks some liquid, preferrably not rotten
FILL      Fills a container with liquid
QUAFF     Drinks a magical potion
USE       Use a magical device
RECITE    Reads a magical scroll
POUR      Fills/empties liquid containers

Buying:

LIST     Shows what items a shopkeeper has for sale
VALUE    Makes the shopkeeper tell you what he'd give for an item
SELL     Sells an item to a shopkeeper. Not all shopkeepers buy anything.
BUY      Buys an item from a shopkeeper
AUCTION  Auctions an item off. Reaches everyone

See also: STAFFS, WANDS, SCROLLS, POTIONS
#
ORC ORCS

Orcs are a crude and vile race where only the strong survive and control the
weak. They are strong and hearty, but they are not so bright. They have
a particular hatred for elves and dwarves. They can see in the dark.

See Also: RACE
#
RENT

For use in the receptions of inns.
When you re-enter, you will start where you rented.

See also: INNS
#
OPEN CLOSE LOCK UNLOCK

To open, close, lock, and unlock doors, of course.

<open | close | lock | unlock> <door> [direction]

> open portal
> lock door
> unlock door south
> close gate

See Also: -
#
ORDER

Used for ordering pets and charmed people to do your evil bidding.  You
can order everyone under your command with "order followers".

order <character> <command>
order followers <command>

> order puppy eat bread
> o fol worship striker

See Also: CHARM
#P
PAGE

Page is a lot like tell but it also beeps the paged person, maybe that'll
get their attention!

See Also: TELL
#
PALM

Palm allows a thief to take an object without others in the room noticing.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL PASS WITHOUT TRACE"

Usage       : cast 'pass without trace' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

This spell renders the victim untrackable.

See Also: -
#
PASSWORDS

If you lose your password you must email the mud from the email that you
have onfile here. (Help email) If you do not have a email onfile and you
lose your password you will not get it changed. Log your email on all of
your chars. 
As always it is not a good idea to SHARE passwords with ANYONE. If you do
share your passwords and the other person gets your char frozen, mute, etc 
We will not listen to why it is your char and it should not be frozen etc
If you continue with the whys you will also be muted and or frozen. 
DON'T SHARE PASSWORDS!

See Also: - EMAIL
#
PEEK

One of the advantages of being a thief is that you can automatically peek
into the inventories of people to look for things to steal.  The skill is
automatic.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL PETRIFICATION"

Usage       : cast 'petrify' <victim>
Accumulation: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Petrify is an extremely powerful offensive spell shared by clerics and 
mages.  The spell can turn a victim into stone.  The full extent of harm 
caused by turning one into stone is not yet known.

See Also : SPELLS
#
PICK "PICK LOCKS"

Thieves only.
For picking locks.  Not all locks can be picked.

pick <door>

> pick door
> pick safe

See Also : OPEN, CLOSE, LOCK, UNLOCK
#
"PLAYER KILLING" PKING PLAYERKILLING

This isn't a PK-mud, so playerkilling is not within the Rules. It's still
possible but not really accepted. Eventually the mud will have wars
and Chaos hours, but for now, PKing is not cool. We have implemented
a system of chaos arenas and deathmatch modes that allow pk on the mud
see and immortal for information.

See Also: POLICIES
#
"SPELL POISON"

Usage       : cast 'poison' <victim | food | drink>
Accumulative: Yes on persons.
Duration    : 2*level hours, or permanent on food and drinks.

Casting poison on food or drink (containers) will poison it.
Eating poisoned food/drinks will poison the person eating or
drinking.

A person who is poisoned will suffer 3 times their level in damage every
hour, and gain less points than usual!!  POISON IN KORE IS DEADLY!!!

See Also: REMOVE POISON
#
POOFOUT POOFIN

When you get the spells relocate (mage, cleric and bard) or windwalk
(druid) you can set your poofin/out for different messages.

Usage: POOFIN HAS ARRIVED
       POOFOUT HAS LEFT THE BUILDING
#
POUR

Pour pours liquid from one container to another, or empties the conainter.

> pour canteen cup
> pour barrel out

See Also: FILL
#
"SPELL POWER WORD STUN"

Usage       : cast 'power word stun' [victim]
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

If successful, power word of stun will cause the victim to fall down and
be stunned.  He or she is then extremely vulnerable to attack, and any
type of attack will do extra damage.  It is good for only one hit, however.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL PRAYER"

Usage       : cast 'prayer'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level based

Prayer grants the powers of bless to all members of caster's group.

See Also: BLESS 
#
"SPELL PROTECTION FROM EVIL"

Usage       : cast 'protection from evil'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24 hours

If your target is evil you take 4/5 of normal damage.
But if you are evil, and the person you are fighting isnt, it
works in reverse and you take 5/4 normal damage.  

See Also: PROTECTION FROM GOOD
#
"SPELL PROTECTION FROM GOOD"

Usage       : cast 'protection from good'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 24 hours

If your target is good you take 4/5 of normal damage.
But if you are good, and the person you are fighting isnt, it
works in reverse and you take 5/4 normal damage.

See Also: PROTECTION FROM EVIL 
#
PURGE PURGING

Purging is one of the most drastic steps an Immortal may take to
discipline a player.  The act of purging junks all of a character's
equipment and inventory, as well as all carried gold.  To be purged
is a serious matter, and not to be taken lightly.
#
PUT

For putting items into containers.

> put bread bag
> put all.bread bag
> put all chest

See also: GET
#Q
QSAY

To tell something to everyone on the current Quest.

See also: QUEST
#
QUAFF POTION POTIONS

Use : Quaff <Potion>

Quaff is used to "drink" a (magical) potion.
#
QUEST

This simple toggle command merely informs the Powers that Be that you
wish to particpate in the currently running Quest.  If an immortal
is running a Quest and needs to know who wishes to participate, he/she
will ask players to turn on their Quest flags using this QUEST command
if they are interested in the Quest.  It also allows you to listen in on
the quest channel and receive information specific to the quest.

> quest

See Also:  QSAY, TOKENS
#
QUICKDRAW

Warrior skill.  An automatic skill: whenever an aggressive mob tries to 
attack you, you will wake up, stand and wield a weapon (if you can) and
hit the mobile before it hits you!  You can also type quickdraw while
sleeping to make yourself wake, stand, and draw a weapon.

See Also: WARRIOR
#
QUICKHEAL

Quickheal awards thieves and warriors an additional 3 hitpoints per level
each tick.  Players must be asleep to benefit this skill.

See Also: -
#
QUIT

If you have no equipment and wants to leave the mud immediately, quit is
the command to go.  To prevent accidents, if you have equipment, you can 
leave the game only by renting.

See Also: INN, RENT
#
QUOTES

Think about what you say, else you might end up here. You see, we will ALWAYS
have the last laugh.
*laugh*
See?

Idea: Zeroneus (Apr 14) take off aggro on mobs... They keep killing me
^m--^n
Tanis gossips, 'I once saw a guy shove 37 grapes into his mouth without
chewing or squishing any of them... That was truly the most amazing thing
I've ever seen'
Tanis gossips, 'Until KORE came along of course..'
^m--^n
Juno says, 'there is such a thing as too long, despite what you pig males
think'
^m--^n
[ (GC) Zirnozz compelled Poseidon to tell aduran how do I get into your
clan? ]
Culvan laughs.
% tell pose I'm not in a clan
% No-one by that name here.
%%
You laugh.
% tell poseidon I'm not in a clan
% No-one by that name here.
%%
Aduran gossips, 'Outcast is not a clan ok? stop asking me to join'
^m---^n
Noe tells you, 'are you a imp what have you for spells if you had spells but
what does imps'
Noe tells you, 'is it fun and dont be mad but i will ask if you had some
good mana eq that i can get dont be mad dont kill me'
^m---^n
Dyrk gossips, 'can i get someone who is completely generous to give a lot of
sweet assed eq? or is that asking too much?'
^m---^n
The auctioneer auctions, 'Knife bids 50000 coins on a gift certificate,
valid for the renaming of one (1) object.'
Cthunik auctions, 'what does that do?'
^m---^n
Karla clan-says, 'so how many whacks did it take to get to the center of a Cross?'
^m---^n
Quantim tells you, 'can you purchase something for me from tellas please? It
isnt that expensive. #64, #65, #55, , and #2. They shoud be less then 15k all
together. but I'm not that good at math.'
^m---^n
also arent thris supposed to be very very long and junk? why cant they wear
2 things on their waste or something.
(post from Arma)
^m---^n
I lent my cleric eq to my best friend's ex-girlfriend and now I DT'd and I
need it back, except I forgot her password and she won't talk to me or my
friend because she's spreading false rumours about us and she doesn't play
anymore.
(Killathrill)
^m---^n
If you had told me you were in fact truly offended by the character I
created, rather than instantly freezing the character, I would have bowed to
your wishes.
(...)
I like you and I'd like to continue playing here. But I won't be bullied.
(...)
You may have the last word here. Forebearance is critical. Restore my chars
and we'll be fine.
(...)
I don't object to your hair-trigger freeze of the character because that is
your option as in Imp.  All I object to is your intrasnagence when I
entreated an eq reimbursement after I tended an explanation of my behavior
as well as an aopology for my offence.
(...)
Yah, well forget all I asked.  Now that I think about it, you were correct.
(RoboChrist)
^m---^n
i don't know why but maerlynb why did you take out my gossip i feel bad and
im hurt by you... I thought you were my friend or are you just someone with
a weird mood changing attitdue i just wanted to as a friend but no you
jujust like to abuse your power and make it all hard and stuff to gossip why
why why I LOVE YOU MAN
(post from KIMO)
^m---^n
ok firstly did you do this cause i quit coven? and calis is your bro? :-P
(...)
could you just freeze me for a week
(...)
i wont say anything about it to
anyone please please unfreeze (me), i have spent so long on this game now
like 2years and spent about 1000 dollers getting my char that good
(...)
i just did it to make the game more fun for everyone and give them something
to do because of this muds really long uptimes
(post from Culhaven)
^m---^n
in the last 3 years i have been here I have never fallen into a dt, and have
never - ever seen this one that is in the palace - south of kore, it was not
marked as a dt - well shit - not really couldnt see it when zmud held and
lagged...i know - im not trying to blame it - it is just that i have/had
never seen taht one there......anything - is there anything
even remotely possible that I could do - to get my eq back
(post from Vermillion)

See Also: -

#
RACE RACES

There are help files on individual races.

Angels
Bugbear
Dragon
Drow
Dwarf
Duergar
Elf
Giant
Gnome
Half-elf
Hobbit
Human
Minotaur
Orc
Thri-kreen
Troll
Undead

#
RAGE

By entering a berserk rage, a warrior increases his stamina and
attack prowess.  By doing this however, he or she chooses to fight
to the bitter end.

See Also: -
#
READ
When you want to read something.

READ is also used to read messages on bulletin boards; type HELP BOARDS
for more information.

> read note

See Also: BOARDS
#
RECALL

Unlike mercs, this circle like other circles does not have free recalls.
Just buy scrolls of recall or use the spell to recall out of battle.
The scrolls are a little spendy but you can afford it if you don't recall
too often.

See Also: -
#
RECITE SCROLL SCROLLS

Use : Recite <Scroll> [Target]

Is used to "read" a magical scroll. Target can be an object, character or
nothing (which may be yourself).

See Also: -
#
"SPELL REFRESH"

Usage       : cast 'refresh' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

When cast, refresh restores movement to the victim, allowing the victim to
move further without the need for rest.

See Also: MASS REFRESH
#
REIMBURSEMENT

See Also : POLICY
#
"SPELL RELOCATE"

Usage       : cast 'relocate' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will relocate the caster to the victim. It is essentially the opposite of
summon.

See Also: SUMMON
#
REMORT

Remorting is something that will be available only to high-level 
characters.  In order to be eligible for remort, a player must have
maxed out on exp.  They must then pass the remort gauntlet, which
will consist of a series of trials in a reserved area.

Remorting consists of being set back to level 1.  You may retain your
race and class, or choose a new race or class, so long as it is a valid
race/class combination.  Certain races are only open to remort.  These
are currently Thri-kreen, Undead, and Angels.

Also, if a character wishes to remort and retain their race and class, they 
can opt either for a random reroll, or to have three attribute points added
to their attributes.  No more than two points can be added to any one attribute
per remort.

Remort restrictions:
Undead may not be Bards or Druids

See Also: ANGEL, UNDEAD, THRI-KREEN
# 
REMOVE 

If you tire of wearing some armor or wielding a weapon.

> remove boots
> remove sword
> remove all
> remove all.bronze

See Also: WEAR, WIELD
#
"SPELL REMOVE CURSE"

Usage       : cast 'remove curse' <person | object>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will remove a curse on carried objects or any persons in the room.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL REMOVE POISON"
Usage       : cast 'remove poison' <victim | food | drink> 
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will remove poison.

See Also: Poison
#
RETURN

The Return command exits magic users from jarred mobs and familiars and 
returns them to their original bodies.

See Also: FIND FAMILIAR, MAGIC JAR 
#
RENANDSTIMPY

Renandstimpy is a social that was asked for by a player, so I thought 
What the hell and put it in.
   .    _  .     _____________
   |\_|/__/|    /             \
  / / \/ \  \  / Happy! Happy! \
 /__|O||O|__ \ \   Joy! Joy!   /
|/_ \_/\_/ _\ | \  ___________/
| | (____) | ||  |/
\/\___/\__/  // _/
(_/         ||
 |          ||\
  \        //_/
   \______//
  __|| __||
 (____(____)  Stimpson J. Cat [Stimpy]

See Also: SOCIALS
#
"SPELL RESTORE"

Usage       : cast 'restore' <victim> 
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Restores up to 1400 hit points per casting.

See Also: HEAL, WILD HEAL 
#
REPEAT

See Also: NOREPEAT
#
REPLY

After someone tells to you, you can use reply <message> to send them
back a brief message.

See Also: TELL
#
REPORT

This command sends a report of your current and max hp and mana to your
group.  You can use this command to let potential rescuers know how
low your hps are without forcing them to use the "group" command.  It is
designed as a convenience for groups with members who get lag or have slow
modems.

> report

See Also: GROUP, FOLLOW, GSAY
#
RESCUE

Fighters and Bards only.

This command is useful if you want to try and make an attacker hit you
instead of your poor friend who is being pummeled.  You can only 'turn'
one monster for each rescue attempt.  This is highly useful when playing
in groups, of course.

rescue <victim>

> rescue quifael

See Also: -
#
RETREAT

Retreat is a skill that allows a thief to find a path away from a monster 
without the monster noticing.  By doing this the character doesn't lose 
the normal exp for fleeing.

See Also: THIEF
#
RIPOSTE

In fencing a riposte is a skillful parry quickly followed with a counter-
thrust. Riposte blocks the mobs' attack and awards the player with an extra
attack of his own for one round of combat.

See Also: BLOCK, DISARM, CRITICAL HIT
#
ROLEPLAYING RP IN-CHARACTER IC

Roleplaying is not required on this mud, but it is something that is smiled
upon if you participate in it. Think of yourself as an actor when you're
roleplaying because that's what you are. You should try to get in the head
of your character when you're roleplaying - try to imagine what they would
do in your current situation, and then do that. Damn drows!

See Also: RACE, SPEAK
#
RULES

Type Policy

See Also: FLAGS POLICY
#S
SACRIFICE

To sacrifice a corpse is to offer it up to the gods.  The corpse will 
disappear and you will be given a small reward.

See Also: AUTOSACRIFICE
#
"SPELL SANCTUARY"
Usage       : cast 'sanctuary' <victim>
Accumulative: no
Duration    : 3 + level/10

When protected by sanctuary you receive one half the normal damage from 
all attacks.

See Also: -
#
SAVE
Save your persona.  This includes experience points, strength, gold, etc.
Your equipment is also saved in the (unlikely?) event of a crash.  The
game periodically auto-saves you and your equipment, so it is not necessary
to have your client auto-save you as well.

You CANNOT load a saved version if you die -- your persona still exists,
but you will lose experience, and all your objects stay in the game, with
your corpse.

Note that the SAVE command only saves your equipment in the event of a
crash.  If you are leaving the game normally, SAVE will NOT save your
equipment -- you must find an Inn to store your belongings.

>save

See Also:  INN, RENT
#
"SAVING THROWS"

The five types of Saving Throws and their effects are as follows:
Save vs Poison is made for poison attacks
Save vs Rod is made for spells cast by a device (i.e. wands)
Save vs Petrification is made for paralysis or petrifying attacks
Save vs Breath is made for all types of breath weapons
Save vs Spell is made to reduce or avoid the effects of a casted spell

At various times during the game, something "special" will affect, or
attempt to affect, your character: things such as spells being cast at
you, poisonous snakes biting you, players using wands on you, etc. In  
these special cases, your character is allowed a SAVING THROW There are
five kinds of saving throws: poison, rods, petrification, breath
weapons, and spells. A successful save means you either avoid the effect 
entirely or the damage received is reduced.                        

On Kore saving throws work on a 25 point scale (instead of 100) and they 
are not modified for level.  So you'll have to wear saving throw eq if 
you want to make saves.

Any saving throw modifier that is negative benefits the player.
SAVING SPELL by -3 is GOOD SAVING SPELL by 1 is BAD.
   
#
SAY TELL ASK WHISPER SHOUT YELL ' "
If you consider communicating with other beings, you might be understood
better if you start your sentences with either say, tell, whisper or shout.

<say | shout > <string>
<tell | whisper | ask> <player> <string>

> say Hey, does anyone know how to get to Oz?
> tell zirnozz hi, you know I have all of your albums.

You can use ' as a shorthand for say, as in: ' hello there.

Shout broadcasts your message to everyone is your geographic zone. You must
be level 2 to use shout.

See Also: GOSSIP, AUCTION, GSAY, NOREPEAT, QSAY
#
SCAN
You can see the rooms around you when you scan. You can scan in one 
direction. Thieves can scan further the higher in level they are, up to
four rooms away when they're very high level.

>scan <direction>
(and to see in all directions...)
>scan

See Also: -
#
"SPELL SCARE"

Usage       : cast 'scare' <victim> 
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous  

This spell has the power to strike unreasoning fear in the bravest heart,
causing the victim to flee. 

See Also: Flee
#
SCORE
Whenever you want to check whether you're still alive and healthy
or simply want to see how much money you have left.

See Also: ATTRIBUTE 
#
SCORES

The command used to see the number of deaths and kills for each player in
the deathmatch.

See Also: BATTLE, DEATHMATCH, DEATHQUEST
#
SCROUNGE
Thief/druid skill.

Scrounge lets player acquire items from the gutters of the city,
such as scraps of food, drinks, and other garbage.  Yecch!

See Also: -
#
SEARCH

Allows you to search a room for hidden items. Typing 'search' once causes
you to begin searching the room; type it again to stop. You may have to
search for quite some time to find a hidden item. Obviously, if nothing's
hidden in the room, you can search and search but not find it.

See Also: -
#
SELL

If you'd like to sell an item to a shopkeeper, trying selling it to them.
Most shops specialize in what they will buy, so you may have to look around
to find a buyer for your items.
 
Examples:
 
> sell sword       (sell the first sword in your inventory)
> sell 3 sword     (sell the first three swords in your inventory)
 
See Also: SHOPS, BUY, LIST, VALUE
#
"SPELL SENSE LIFE"
Usage       : cast 'sense life' [self]
Accumulative: No
Duration    : 5 hours per level

This spell will enable you to sense hidden life forms in a room.
Invisible persons are also considered hidden.

See Also: HIDE
#
"SPELL SHOCKING GRASP"

Usage       : cast 'shocking grasp' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous
Save        : Versus spell for half damage.

This spell is more powerful than the magic missile spell.

See Also: MAGIC MISSILE  
#
SHOPS

Shops are places where the adventurer may purchase equipment for his quests,
and where he may sell his treasure if he should manage to survive the perils
with his life and sanity intact. Many shops trade only in a specific type of
merchandise. Thus, a baker may well refuse to buy your armor, even if it is of
high quality!
   To some people, the prospect of obtaining the entire inventory of a shop by
murdering the keeper may appear tempting - but beware: The shopkeepers are 
often rugged, capable men; roughened by years of trading and, indeed, surviving
in a world where the only safe prospect is death in the end.

See also: BUY, SELL, LIST, VALUE
#
SKILLS

Classes like Fighters and Thieves get skills instead of spells.
These skills generally do not cost any attributes, unlike spells
which require mana.  You can list your skills with the spells command.

See Also: SPELLS
#
"SPELL SLEEP"

Usage       : cast 'sleep' <person>
Accumulative: Yes (duration)
Duration    : 4 hours + one hour per level

If failing saving throw versus spell, the person will fall asleep.
A person who is affected by sleep can only be awakened if attacked.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL SLOW"

Usage       : cast 'slow' <victim>                        
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Varies

Slow reduces the victim's attack speed.

See Also: HASTE 
#
SMILE
Whenever you feel like smiling...

See Also: SOCIALS
#
SNEAK

Thieves Only.

Used for sneaking (moving in and out of rooms without anyone taking notice).
When you type sneak, there is no way to know if you're actually sneaking.
If you sucessfully sneak, then you'll continue to sneak for a little while.

> sneak

See Also : HIDE
#
SOCIALS

Socials are commands used to show your affective state to others.  The
actor, victim and bystanders may receive different messages.  Generally,
social commands are used only to express emotion, but it is possible that
some mobs (or players) will take action based on the social.

<social> <victim>

> shake homer
> applaud marge
> stare 

The SOCIALS command generates a canonical listing of all available socials.

> socials

See Also: EMOTE
#
SPEAK

To speak in your native tongue, instead of common.

Example: 
>speak damn elves, lets kill them and take all their gold

See Also: RACE
#
SPELLS

Lists all skills and spells available to your class.

For help on a particular spell see: "help spell <spellname>"

See Also: SKILLS
#
"SPELL SPIRITUAL HAMMER"

Usage       : cast 'spiritual hammer'
Accumulative: No

Creates a magical hammer which can be wielded as a potent weapon.
However, the hammer, being spiritual in origin, will disappear in time.

See Also: -
#
SPLIT

Usage:  SPLIT <amount to split>

SPLIT is used to split money among people in your group who are in the same
room as you.  If you are in a group with 4 other people, all of whom are in
the same room with you, and you type SPLIT 100, you will give each of the
other 4 group members 20 coins each.  (100 coins is split 5 ways; you keep
your share and give everyone else their share).

See Also: GROUP, FOLLOW
#
STATS

See Also : ATTRIBUTES
#
STEAL

Thief Only.

Use steal to steal gold or items from people. The chance of not getting
caught depends on your skill.  If the person is asleep, steal always succeed.

Due to misuse of the steal command, it is now illegal to steal from other
players.  Doing so will get you a flag for your trouble.

Example:

> steal gold drunk

See Also: -
#
"SPELL STICKS TO SNAKES"

Usage       : cast 'sticks to snakes'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Summons a snake and makes it follow the caster.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL STONE SKIN" "SPELL STONESKIN"

Usage       : cast 'stoneskin' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Until last stony layer is destroyed

When stoneskin is cast, the victim gains layers of tough stony covering
on his/her/its skin (how many depends on the level of the caster).  Each
layer completely absorbs one combat hit before being destroyed.  Stoneskin
may be recast only when all layers are destroyed by hits or by time.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL STRENGTH"

Usage       : cast 'strength' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Level hours

A person will gain 1 strength point from spell.  Maximum strength is 25. 

See Also: -
#
STUN "STUN TOUCH"

Thief only

Stun touch puts the victim in a stunned state for a moment, not allowing 
them to attack and taking more damage from physical attacks.  The victim 
is left unable to defend themself for a short time.  Stun touch delays
the thief for three rounds.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL SUMMON"

Usage       : cast 'summon' <victim>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Will summon a person of the name spoken. It is not possible to
summon someone of three or more levels above yourself.
If you attempt to summon a monster,it will get a saving throw.

See Also: RELOCATE, POLICY
#
"SPELL SUNRAY"

Usage        : cast 'sunray' <victim>
Accumulative : -
Duration     : Instantaneous

Sunray beams a ray of sunlight on the victim.  It is not intense enough to
hurt even a child, but rumors persist of situations where it is deadly...

See Also: -
#
SWITCH

Warrior skill that allows them to change targets while in combat.
It also allows the warrior to switch to the beginning of the
combat list, meaning they attack earlier than the mob.

See Also: -
#T
"SPELL TELEPORT"

Usage       : cast 'teleport' <self>
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instant

Teleport (with error) will instantly transfer you to another location
in the world. This location is random, and thus there will always be
a risk of landing in a fatal location.

See Also: -
#
TELLAS PAWN PAWNSHOP

A place one can try and sell equipment for a percent of the profits.
Try not to sell any junk here. Also do not ask a price so high for
equipment that no one will buy. IE : Mushroom rings for 50k. It will
be removed and you will lose the object.

#
THIEF THIEVES
Thiefs are known to have very special qualities, that no other class offers.
They are deadly backstabbers, often sneaking in the killing blow before
the victim can react.  They know many dirty tricks in combat to confuse
their enemies.  They can pick locks that would frustrate the most powerful
of warriors.

Here is a list of your skills at level 50:

SPELLNAME		LEVEL	COST
scrounge		1	n/a
sneak			1	n/a
backstab		3	n/a
steal			5	n/a
pick lock		7	n/a
hide			9	n/a
palm			10	n/a
quickheal		10	n/a
scan			15	n/a
circle			20	n/a
stun touch		20	n/a
retreat			22	n/a
track			25	n/a
gauge			30	n/a
trip			35	n/a

See Also: CLASSES, SPELLS
#
THRIKREEN THRI-KREEN TRI-KEEN TRI-KREEN TRI

Thri-kreen are a mantis-like race who are not from this world. Their origin
has been lost over the ages; they don't even remember where they are from.
It has been speculated that they arrived here from some strange metal ship
that fell from the sky. Since they are not from this world, they do not
have the ability to cast magic spells. However, they are very strong, fast,
and hearty. They are not very intelligent or insightful due to their 
insect mentality. They have a particular fondness for elven flesh.

They can sense-life and they also have no need for sleeping or drinking. 
They are also capable of giving their victims venomous bites. Thri-kreen
are also immune to the "blindness" spell.

Thri-kreens are now available as a remort option, with extensive changes 
to their equipment slots.

See Also: RACE, REMORT
# 
TIME 

Gives you the current game time.  Your initial reaction to the
output of this command may be one of surprise, but you'll get used to it. 
You'll have to, at any rate, since certain things in the game depend on
this particular notion of time; the opening hours of the shops, for
example.

See Also: -
#
UPTIME

    Displays when the game was last booted and calculates how much time has 
passed since.

#
TITLES

Titles are set through a request to the imms. Players at or under level 20
have the generic titles. Players over level 20 may request that their title
be changed to a suitable one of their liking (not suitable: "wetted his bed
last night").
Mudmail Ayana with your request for a title. It must fit the mud and not be
stupid or offensive. No request for colors in titles. If your request does
not fit the mud, is stupid and or asks for colors, your request will not be
answered.

See Also: FLAGS
#
TOGGLES

TOGGLE shows you the current values of various toggles available on the MUD.
This command CAN NOT be used to change these values (see related commands.)
All of these toggles remain the same until you change them; i.e. they are
saved when you quit or rent.

See Also: DISPLAY, BRIEF, COMPACT, NOTELL, NOSHOUT, NOSUMMON, QUEST, REPEAT,
          WIMP, BATTLEBRIEF
#
TOKENS

Shiny quest tokens can be exchanged for rewards on the following scale:

15 - A pretitle
10 - An item rename certificate
8 - an amulet of Yari

Other prizes may be given out per specific quest at the perrogative of
the quest organizer.

Gold quest tokens are to be given to the gleeman for prizes.

See Also: QUEST
#
TRIVIA

Every now and then there will be trivia questions asked which you will 
receive a trivia point for, if you are the first to answer it right. 
You can save these points for prizes. 

40 - A bag full of potions
35 - A pretitle
30 - An item rename certificate
25 - An amulet of Yari
20 - Black Sash
15 - Shiny Quest Token
10 - Gold Quest Token
05 - An Karn ruin the mud t-shirt or an I love Ayana t-shirt or an
     I been downgraded button.

This is just one way a trivia quest may be handled. It will depend on
the immortal who is running the quest.

After you receive ten trivia points they can be turned in for one ten
points trivia point. To help the pack rats to keep their loads light.

^RThe Trivia Points are for the char that answers the question. They are
not to be given away to other chars. Anyone caught doing so will lose
all trivia points.^n

#
TROLLS

Trolls are a race of large humanoid creatures.  Very strong, but not 
exceptionally bright.  They make excellent warriors however. They can see
in the dark.

See Also: RACE
#
TRACK

Used for finding the first step on the shortest route to a monster.
Be aware that you may track into untenable situations.

> track zeus 

See Also: -
#
TRIP

Thief only skill. It trips, you dip.

See Also : BASH
#
TWINK

Clueless person. A high level newbie.

Example: Bozo is a Major Fucking Twink!

See Also: NEWBIE
#U
UNDEAD

Undead are a race of magical creatures.  They include beings such as 
liches, ghouls, vampires, deathknights, and ghosts.  Their magical nature 
has made them resistant to magical attacks.  They are also often very 
intelligent and wise due to their age.  Undead are available only as a 
remort race. Undead beings have the power of gaze and bite. They must
drink blood either using bite or via some other source. They can also
see invisible objects.

See Also: DRAGON, KNIGHT, REMORT
#
UNGROUP

UNGROUP can be used by group leaders to disband the entire group, or
to kick a specific group member out of the group (and stop him/her from
following the leader).

> ungroup
> ungroup all
> ungroup loser

See Also: GROUP
#
USE WAND STAFF STAFFS WANDS

Use : Use <staff>
      Use <wand> <victim>

Using staff's will automatically target everybody (or everything) in a
room, execpt yourself. Therefore staff's are naturally very powerful, and
yet may be very dangerous to use around other players.

Using wands require that you point it at a target, which can be either a
character or an object.

Both staff's and wand's must be HELD in the hand prior to use! (Use the
grab or hold commands). You must still supply the name of the staff or
wand to avoid confusion.

See Also: -
#
UTILITY
These are commands designed to make the mud a better place:

TOGGLE     The top level command to view a lot of settings
COLOR      Color-code mud output
PROMPT     Changes your prompt
ALIAS      Create shortcuts for used commands
BUG        Report a bug that you know about
IDEA       Suggest any ideas have to improve the MUD
TYPO       Report a typo (be specific)
SAVE       Save your character
!          Repeats the last command you typed

See also: -
#V
VALUE
Before selling an item to a shop, you can ask the shopkeeper how much
he or she is willing to pay for it.
 
Example:
 
> value bread
 
See Also: SHOPS, BUY, SELL, LIST
#
VAMPIRE

SPELLNAME               LEVEL  COST
continual light          1     5
kick                     1   n/a
magic missile            1    10
meditate                 1   n/a
ventriloquate            1    10
armor                    2    10
aerial servant           3    30
burning hands            4    15
faerie fire              4    10
floating disc            4    20
clairvoyance             5    20
find familiar            5    40
bash                     6   n/a
detect magic             6    10
invisibility             6    30
feeblemind               7    10
strength                 9    25
disarm                  10   n/a
pass without trace      12    11
locate object           13    30
shocking grasp          14    15
animate dead            15    51
dimension door          15    25
web                     15    25
chill touch             16    16
mass invis              18    41
sleep                   18    25
energy drain            20    25
monster summoning one   20    50
protection from good    20    40
scare                   20   100
identify                21    25
invisible stalker       22    50
infravision             23    25
charm person            24    70
forget                  24    21
word of recall          24     6
fly                     25    21
color spray             26    21
blindness               27    26
poison                  28    21
curse                   29    30
enchant armor           30    78
cone of cold            31    50
conjure elemental       32   102
haste                   32    75
monster summoning two   32   100
lightning bolt          34    50
fireball                36    50
dispel magic            38    50
enchant weapon          38   150
monster summoning three 39   150
phase door              39    50
chain lightning         40    50
disintegrate            42    60
word of death           44   100
petrify                 45   100
knock                   46    80
instill energy          49   200
magic jar               50   200

See Also: - CLASSES
#
"SPELL VENTRILOQUATE"

By using this spell you can attempt to make it appear someone else in
the same room said something.

#
VETERAN

The veteran flag on an item requires that the wearer be at least level 25 to
use that item.

See Also: HERO CHAMPION
#
VISIBLE

Use this command to break your spell of invisibility before it expires.

See Also: INVISIBILITY
#
VULMARTA

Vulmarta is the ancient goddess of the seasons and womanhood. She's a fairly
neutral god and somewhat dispassionate.

See Also: -
#W
WAKE SLEEPING REST SIT STAND
For changing your position.  If you feel weary, it's probably a good idea
to sit and rest for a while, or maybe even take a nap.

See Also: -
#
WARRIORS FIGHTERS
Warriors are known to have more strength than the average player. This makes
them better at hand-to-hand-combat, as they posess skills of violence and
fighting unequaled by the members of any other class. However, they lack the
ability to use magic of any sort.

Here is a list of your skills at level 50:
 
SPELLNAME		LEVEL  COST
judge                      1   n/a
kick                       1   n/a
bash                       2   n/a
rescue                     3   n/a
track                      9   n/a
disarm                    10   n/a
quickheal                 10   n/a
critical hit              10   n/a
berserk                   15   n/a
block                     15   n/a
defend                    15   n/a
rage                      18   n/a
switch                    20   n/a
dual wield                25   n/a
quickdraw                 36   n/a
riposte			  40   n/a

See Also: CLASSES, SPELLS
#
"SPELL WATERWALK"

Usage       : cast 'waterwalk' <victim>
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : Varies

Waterwalk allows the target player or mob to walk on water.  There is
still a movement cost involved with walking.

See Also: FLY, MOVEMENT
#
WEAR

If you want to wear some clothes, armor or the likes.

Also, to wear everything in your inventory (or at least try to, as wearing 
things like loaves of bread is not a good way to win friends and influence
people) you can type "wear all".

Optionally, you can specify what part of your body to wear the equipment on.

> wear boots
> wear all.bronze
> wear all
> wear ring finger

See Also: EQUIPMENT, REMOVE EQUIPMENT
#
WEATHER

If you're uncertain whether the sun is shining or the rain is pouring down.

See Also: CONTROL WEATHER
#
WHERE

Tells you the location of a monster, a player or an object.

Mortals can only "where" players, and only from their own zone.

> where

** Note that this command has been disabled and that this helpfile has
absolutely no significance anymore.

See Also: LOCATE OBJECT
#
"SPELL WEB"

Usage       : cast 'web' <victim>
Accumulative: Yes
Duration    : Instant

Web instantly covers the victim with icky strands of webbing. For now what
web does is subtract about one third of the mobs movement - useful in keeping
a mob from fleeing!

See Also: -
#
WHO

Lists the people currently in the game.  Some people may be invisible.
Command-line options can be used to limit the listing.  The parameters
can be specified on the command-line in any order.

who [minlev[-maxlev]] [-n sname] [-c classlist] [-s] [-o] [-q] [-r] [-z]

minlev, maxlev : list only people whose level is at or above minlev, and
     optionally, at or below maxlev
-n : list only people whose names or titles contain sname
-c : list only people of a certain class, where classlist is any combination
     of the letters w, m, c, and t
-s : list names in the short form (4 columns of names, without titles or flags)
-o : list only outlaws (i.e. people with a killer or thief flag)
-q : list only people who are on the Quest
-r : list only people who are in your room
-z : list only people in your zone
-b : list only people in your clan

> who -c wc -s -l 20
	List, in short form, warriors and clerics at or above level 20
> who 15-25 -o -z
	List all outlaws between levels 15 and 25 who are in your zone.

See Also: -
#
WIELD

When you get tired of bashing monsters with your fists, you might consider
wielding a weapon.

> wield sword

See Also: EQUIPMENT, REMOVE EQUIPMENT
#
"SPELL WILD HEAL"

Usage       : cast 'wild heal' <victim>
Accumulation: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

Results of wild heal:
 Amount Healed    Percent
 -75              5
 -25              15
 150              60
 175              15
 200              5

See Also: HEAL
#
WIMP WIMPY

There is no more wimpy on HOK. If you can't flee for yourself then die like
the dog you are. Zirnozz will probably laugh at you.

See Also: LINK
#
"SPELL WINDWALK"

Usage       : cast 'windwalk' <victim>
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Instantaneous

Provided that the caster is standing in a natural setting, windwalk will
instantaneously relocate the caster to the victim.

See Also: RELOCATE, SUMMON
#
"SPELL WIZARD LOCK"

Usage       : cast 'wizard lock'
Accumulative: No
Duration    : Permanent (see below)

This spell is used to close and lock all doors in the room. This is
useful for locking in/out players or mobs. This spell can only be 
reversed by the "Knock" spell or the "Pick" skill.

See Also: KNOCK, PICK
#
WIZLIST IMMLIST

Lists the most powerful beings on the MUD.

See Also: -
#
"SPELL WORD OF RECALL"

Usage       : cast 'word of recall' 
Accumulative: -
Duration    : Instantaneous

The caster will be transferred back to his sanctuary (presently
the Temple of Vulmarta).

See Also: RECALL 
#
"SPELL WORD OF DEATH"

Usage       : cast 'word of death' <victim>
Accumulation: -
Damage      : unknown
Duration    : Instantaneous

It is said that a high level mage can kill with a single word.  
This is the most powerful spell known in the realm of Kore.  With this 
spell dragons have been slain, kings overthrown, and mighty warriors 
reduced to ash.

See Also: MAGE
#
WRITE

In order to write a note, you need a piece of blank paper (or similar), and
a pen of some sort. You can then type something like "write on the paper with
the pen", whereupon you'll be asked to type in your note at the keyboard.

WRITE is also used to post messages to bulletin boards.  Type HELP BOARDS
for more information.

See Also: BOARDS
#~
 
